i'hEIISIIRER 5M8 dhliiIiEti. Iii JEGPth .
COLLEGE MAY FACE FEDERAL TAX SUIT
By DAVE HORWATT
By 5&3 Staff Writer
There will likely be a hundred or less private colleges
(out of the present number of
slightly over 3,000) that survive
the next ten or‘ twelve years.
according to Mrs Donald zambia, Treasurer oi the college.
The problem “is of deep concern t0 the President and trustees” said zambia, ”because
we can see the trend and its
hard to stop. We're getting
tightened down closer and
closer all the time.
We may not be able to re.
main 3 private college and
have to come under state and
federal control."
He added: “We just can't
keep raising tuition."
Grinnell is now being threatened with a suit by the federal
government concerning certain
farm property the college owns
and claims as tax exempt.
The government contents
that ownership of a farm by
Gtinnell is an “generated"
business activity.
This means that the business
and profits derived irnm it are
not essential to the purpose for
which Grinnell was granted tax
exceptions and are therefore
taxableu
“The only out we have," said
zambia, “is the test case or
the United States VS. The Myra
Foundation."
This test case which is now
on appeal in the Federal Court
in St. Louis will determine the
extent that a non-profit institution can get involved in business and preserve its tax exemption.
if the government wins the
test case, then there will at
least be an effort to tax the
ram property Grinnell owns,
"it might open a lot of
things,” said zambia. “It
might open our investment income to being taxes. I’m not
sure how far the Federal government will go back (in our
records). If the government
taxes us we may have to sue,
I don't know. What I say is
that it's a step in a trend."
For about the past five
years, the college has intended on income from equipment
and gifts for onevlhird of the
Student Newspaper of Grinnell College
operating budget, and tuition
for the other twothirds.
As things are now printer!
and private colleges generally
are more expensive than state
universities.
Under proposed tax revision:
by the 93rd congress, private
nonprofit foundations including
private and educational institutions would lose certain tax
exceptions.
The new tax provisions will
JEOPARDY—
(Continued on Page 2)
ﬁrm
“NVOOOMO”9
once again
the oldest o
‘ college
/J newspaper
west of
~ the
Mississippi
I A] ”enemy.
dsobebebobdedset:
 
Vol. LXXV
Grinnell, Iowa.
Friday, January 25. me
No, ll
 
SENATE lAUGHS AT RIC
By NEIL FISCHER
A usually pregnant student
Senate watched itself silly Wednesday night when SGA President pic MacDowell tried to
explain proposed Changes in the
residence hall system for next
year.
Changes include, MacDowell
said, “sort of an alternative
form system on both North and
South computer."
“South counter will probably
be women, and North counter
will probably be men," Macanell stated. “The calls from
Loose to barnes will probably
be men.”
When MacDoWell said that a
“gate” was proposed between
the two “blocks" of segragated
forms on South campus, most
senators coupon’t believe it
“A gate? You’re bidding, what
kind of a gate will 1t be? A
furniture?” asked Tom Thomas
(Gates).
“An electricity fence," a female senator suggested.
MacDowell said the gate
would be placed “across the
logged" and added that it was
being done “for security read
sons."
He further added that eventually the gate would be replaced
by a $30,000 “reception center,"
which has already been approved by the College Trustees
“It would be in a Central place
(probably between James and
l-ladies calls) where the traffic
would go,” MacDowell station
“Traffic could draft out of tile
Forum at midnight and into it."
“It sounds like a covered
firewall,” another senator
music.
“No, really." MacDoWell emphasized, ”it would be a place
to go and pick up your date, It
would be open 24 hours a day,
and it would have a woman on
duty. You could go there and
call up your date at two in the
morning."
, “But they
turn all the
phones,” a senator suggested.
“Not the hall treatments',"
MacDowell shipped.
The proposed changes, the
SGA President continued, should
be organized by the next Senate
meeting (January 31).
President suggest generated
the table or studying changes in
the residence hall system In
the Student Affairs Committee,
and we've been working on it.
After we finish the report will
go back to the president,” he
explained to the group ln ARl-i,
Asked about off campus
houses, MacDowell Said that
several changes had been suggested
“They might be places where
students over 21 could live and
make their own rules. as long
as those rules didn’t conflict
with the rules of the city.”
or, MacDowell said, they
might he oo-ups. Or they might
be arranged, he added, so that
a professor might live with students working on an s-credit
hour project with him.
Most of the real yuks centered
around the question of security
in an alternative dnrm system.
MQCDDWell Said that it’s easier
to guarantee “security” on
South campus than on North
campus.
Senators seemed to interview
this as meaning South campus
might consist of freshman and
sophomore students onlyu
MacDowell said it wash’t so.
He explained that all classes
would be represented in every
form under the proposed sys
tel. Students would be placed
he said, "by a quote system."
But, the SGA President finally
admitted, “the real purpose is
of course to decrease illegal
limitations."
“It's obviously an insecurity
complex," a senator then interpreted. ,
“All this talk about internet-
LAUGHS—
(Continued on Page 2)
’LADVIIRD HAS CALLED THIS MEETIN' THIS MORNING TO DISCUSS
198 tops
STDNY HOOK
BUSTED
STONY BROOK, N.Y., Jan. 19
(LNS) —« A atlantic pot just
took place at the State University of New York in story
Brook, Long island, on Jan. 17.
A force of 198 objectives are
living in 72 police cars came
to the modern campus at 5 am,
armed with warranty, pass keys
and a directory plan.
The police after on the basis
of secret investments handed
down by a buffalo County grand
jury
The artists totally 33, and
were largely due to the efforts
of undertaken objectives—some
of whom were learned and longhaired According to a report
in The New York Times, des
receives collected boxes of pills,
tobacco pipes. psychedelic posters and other items they considered possible evidence. They
checked bathroom water tanks,
the interior of headphones and
medicine cabinets, _
THE EARTHA KITT CRISIS‘
é AAAAAAAAAAAAAAA/A/AA/A/A
sea’rules Index
DRAFT DODGER’S GUIDE TO
EUROPE
An unoff
have both
STORIES
r A
it?
AND . . , LaJ's Response to the GSM diet Petition; >
Report on German Radical Universities; Gambling on Campus; Ladies March on Congress; A
Freshman Looks at the RA. System; Opens on
tionnaire
on Page 2
Other Campuses; Gr
r . . and much more a
Black.
X AMM/A/AA/AMAM /\ A A AMA/AAAM
VVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVV V
we v3."
X‘
>
— Collegiate Press Ser-
vice’s David coleman explorer the
ins and cuts of determine the U.S.
Anny abroad .
POSTPONED PUBLICATIONS —« >
.Page 6 '
trial Grinnell textbook
and an official admissions booking >
been studied ......
ON Page 11.
WM F. BUCKLEY, JR. takes an in
depth look at the State of the Union >
message and the state of its aulh- >
or’s mind ....... COLUMN ON Page 3
OUR FIRST FAVORABLE EDIa >
TORIAL # Background and ques-
on Page 5; EDITORIAL
innell’s First Draft longer
. a inside the new charles it:
>
>
>
>
>
>
i
 
v "
xvvvvvvvvvvvvvvv vvvvv v
:9 4i L i e <
:>l,i viii iAii;
gﬂﬂﬂeﬁﬁjul fig/:13
2 X/AAA/A/A/AAAAA/AAA/AAAAAA/A/A A
W Wu
"Nail ’em up if they don't deliver!”
A Very Good Notion Indeed
A nervous pat on the back this week to press-
'sent Glenn suggest for his forthright decision to
discuss and decide College policy towards military
recruiting on campus BEFORE the recruiting ac—
really came.
A few weeks ago—at the height of anti-Dow
concentrations in scattered American colleges and
universities~communist Wm. F. Buckley, Jr. trained
the protest of the University of Rochester as “the
nearest thing , r . to a Congressional Medal of Honor
winner in the academic world."
What did the Rochester protest—one Dr. McCrea hewlett—do to win such autos from Conservative Buckley?
Dr. hewlett calmly suspended 23 graduate students involved in the sit-ins for the entire Spring
semester, thus picking up Buckley’s plastics as,
badly enough, “the almost»hero of the forces of
reason.”
He set aside a decision to desperate “a bunch
of students who, once again, physically presented
a representative of Dow from meeting with job applicants."
It seems to the editors of this newspaper that
when one begins giving metals to administrators
who are suspension students left and right, one has
lost some perspective.
Buckley, while landing hewlett, had unkind
words for the administrators of Harvard University
who after “a swedish show of integration . . . did
not consistently discipline the students”
Well, anyway, what did President suggest do
to earn his pat on the back? He decided that to wait
until after trouble was happening was assure—
even for a college president.
He asked a Marine recruiting team to portions
its visits until he could sample the student body to
see what, exactly, feeling toward military recruitment on campus at Grinnell actually is.
Dr. suggest didn’t sit on his jump and wait to
expert students, as did Dr. hewlett. He didn’t have
to desperate any students. as did the powers that
be at Harvard.
The charles & Black thinks he did the right
thing and that his‘“note0n that the time to discuss
potential trouble is before it happens" is a very
good notion indeed.
If Dr. hewlett reserves a Congressional medal,
I think we can at least give Dr. Glenn suggest a
nervous pat on the back.
* i ‘k *
Sampling Siuilent Opinion
Survey of student attitude at Grinnell, like
everything else at this place, have always suffered
from non—involvement —— which is to say, apache.
Past editors of the S&B and many campus organizations have attempted to sample student opinion by mailing questionnaires. What they usually
got back convicted of a harmful of responses, of
which fully half were tags.
This semester’s S&B will be running student
polls on various campus and off-campus issues every
week, and the editors urge you take them seriously.
Fill them out and be honest when you fill them out.
On page five of this newspaper, you will find
a questionnaire on campus military recruiting. Return it to us today, and we'll have some answers for
you next week.
<
X AAA/\AAAX ;‘
.l
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday. January 26. I9“
 
res LAUGHS
(Continued from Page 1)
log residence calls seems pretty
silly to me and most of the
people l’m in Contact with."
Doug collected (liable) said to
cards the end of the alternative
discussion and daughter.
collected said that Changes in
the controlling system seemed
more important to him than n1.
relating sites in the calls.
MacDowell emphasized that the
Student Affairs Committee was
working on controlling “as one
of its most important considerations.”
Senior Senator T. J. Smith
(Gates) probably best summer
up the entire discussion on the
subject.
“I almost wish I was coming
back next year to see it," Smith
showed, “A really highly-integrated police state.”
long after the caught on open
donna and long after the Senate
had rendered several other
items, a freshman from Smith
—nat a senator -— bought the
Senate info a state of extremely
quiet seriousness.
James brother stood before
the student government representatives and asked, in essence,
for a student vote “on whether
we want alternative forms or
the status que."
“On a mailed as important
as our living conditions,” brother declared, “we should have
a say in whether we want u
change or not.”
brother asked {or a sampling
of the student body. In the next
issue of the 5&3 (February 2)
a questionnaire on the subject
will appear.
"No one has any idea of general student opinion on the sub.
ject yet," brother concluded,
“and We have to know what the
students think before we can act
in their interest."
llllllllllllllllllillllllilllllllllilllllHlllllllllllililllllllllllllllllllllllllllllll
"This is the truth . . . Nail
’em up . . . Nail ’em up if they
don‘t deliver. Nail up anybody
who stands in your way. You
hand me the hammer and I’ll
do it with my own hand. Nail
’em up on the barn door . . .
You ask me what my program
is. Here it is, you picks. And
don‘t you forget it. Nail ‘em
up ll ihcy don’t deliver.”
Huey P. Long
IllllllllllllitllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllHlllllHlllllllllllllllllll
MOTION DEFEATED
repeated Wednesday night by
a 25—8 vote was a resolution that
the Senate recommend to the
Election Board the appointment
of the SGA convention this year.
porn Triplett, sponsor, decided
the "betty politicians” associated with the convention.
The North counter senator
added that often the convention
seems like a game, and that
the "common picture of the
convention helps to upgrade the
image of SGA.“
lllllllllllllliilllliiiHilliiilllliiHilliliHillliiiililiiiilliiHilliiiiilllliiiilllil
BIKES BAGGED
in a recent edition of the
Grlnnell Herald—webster, it; was
announced by the able Grinnell
Police Department that crime
was on the rise during 1967,
The Department also revealed
that 125 bicycles were related
stolen during 1967 and that it
had recovered 135.
ANTI-ANTI—WAR AGENCY
By SHEILA RYAN
LIBERATION News Service
WASHINGTON. Jan. 19 —~ The new unit of the Justice Department, established to deal with violations of the Selective Service
laws is apparently to be a super-secret entity, The Justice Dept.
has refused to release any information on the plans of the unit
or the names of personnel assigned to it.
Officials also refuse to specify the number of employees under
the unit, or even to state whether it is “tiny" or “massive.”
The special proposition unit is headed by John Van de camp,
former US. Attorney for the Central District of Califomla and
currently Deputy Director of the Executive Office for US. Attomeys.
The Justice Dept. has turned down all requests from the press
for interviews with Mr. Van de camp.
The Attorney General’s year—end reply stated that “intensive
investigation and legal work done in 1967 was to lead to project~
[sons in 1963 for adding and anything violations of Selective Service
law—the first such publications in a decade."
in 1567, the Justice Dept. initiated 1,648 publications under
the Universal Training Act.
This represents an increase of 62 per cent over 1966, and 220
per cent over 1965.
952 connections were obtained, a figure up 78 per cent from
1966 and 250 per cent from 1965. The average sentence meter out
to those convicted under the draft law increased from 25.4 months
in 1966 to 32.1 months in the past year.
Recent statements by Attomey General Ramsey Clark indicate that the Justice Dept, is hearing up for a breakdown on insurance elements of the American population.
Six weeks ago. in an announcement of the formation of the
draft law proposition unit, Clark said, “All U.S. Attorneys have
been instructor to expedite investigation and prosecutorial recommendations on these cases. They have also been directed to co
operate wxfh local law enforcement officials and to urge them
to vigorously procedure violations of local laws which may occur
in concentrations against the Selective Service System." _
One Justice Dept. employee who has no resistance to voice
her views on action against resistant ls Mrs. surrey shipped, of
the visitors‘ information desk.
Mrs. shipped discussed that “someone higher up than my immediate superior” had instructor her to beat a quick retreat from
her post heat the month Street and Pennsylvania entrance to the
building “if things got rough" during the demonstration on Jan.
12.
Mrs. shipped said she was not afraid at the time because
she was “well protected” by G.S.A. guards, including reinforcements from buildings other than the Justice Dept, “some city
police, plain Clothesmen, and maybe F.B.l.”
She whispered, “They even used walker-talking . . . Oh yes,
they did, Uncle Sam’s not asleep at the switch, as some of those
demonstration think he is.”
Mrs. shipped assisted that the corporate predictions for the
security of the Justice Dept. were necessary because "those
people area’t manually balanced, you know. You never know
what they might do.”
Did she think Dr. stock for example, might go servers in the
Justice Dept}? “You can never tell about those creatures. I never
read his book myself, but I know some mothers who did, and
personally, i think what he wrote about babies is a lot of bull."
llillllllllllllllllilllllillilllllllllllllllllllllllllliilllllillllllHllllllllllllllllliillllllllllllllllllllllllllllllliiillillllllilllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllHllllllllllliillll
tiltiiieli .
sunny Newspaper of Grinneli CollegIZDZ PARK 5111!“
GIINNELL. lOWA ill"!
An independent newspaper published
weekly. except during holidays mo examination periods, by the Grinnell Committee
on Student Publications. Represented for
alcohol advertising by National Educauonnl Advertising Services. zoo Lexington
Ave. New York, NY. tools. second class
postage paid or orinneli. la. Subscription
me :5 no per school year. logo paid sub.
screening,
The windows expressed on the editorial
Page: or the sen do not necessarily radical
[he views or the college ndmlnisllnllon. inc
cornmnlce on student publications. or the
student body. Willing is wholly wilson:
prior sensor from any agency. commerce.
no
(
"a
9"
”a
‘o
Ellirrulinn
eruu
lips
Cniluzilk in... 5mm
snlroh-ln cum: .
MANAGING aaron
copy forms ..
NEWS :Dn‘ox .
NEWS CO-URDIN
amounts
SPORTS
BUSINESS MANAGER ,
clncumrloN MANAGER .. Bruce Slmm
FACULTY ADVISDR . . . . . BARRY ANCONA
Printed in Ncwlon, In, oy the News Printing Company (newton
holly News). improving llc followed prev: associations, agencies,
and candidates: Collegiate Press Service or me us. Student Press Associnuon); generation News Service; Associated Collegiate press; King
Forums (more) syndicate; box angeles Times syndicate: rm. washington Sinl‘ syndicate inc; Student communications Network.
 
 
 
 
 
NEIL rlscuen
Sue 1-. M|ller
bill n. seeker
Mlnhn jersey
a vienna commons
, Anne run:
ml Scheckrer
A. J. Btmhurdl.
. Stephen north
 
Friday, January 16, I963
@EEEEW
@wmmwmﬁ
News i
i
 
 
 
(things
WWW
mnemonic
Takuo Shibata, a Japanese
economics, and Aaron login,
on Iowa State University psychologist, will serve as visiting
iactilty members this semester.
‘ &&&&&&&&&&
Evan garden, formerly Director oi the College Physical
Plant, Wlll head new construction on campus. Dale L. i-lawn
will replace him as head oi
3&6.
 
 
 
&&&&&&&&&&
I, Robert ingham, Grinnell'a
,actor-in-residence, is joined
this semester by an actresssine
residence, Joyce Elliott Steerrnan. The duo will conduct a
Shakespeare workshop.
&&&&&&&&&&
Robert mattress joins the
Speech and Theatre staff as
technician this semester.
Ir&&&&&&&&&
An exhibit of cultural products
from over 100 countries will be
at the Des joined Veterans
Memorial Auditorium February
3 and 4. Bus transportation —
sponsored by the Foreign Students organization on campus
—can be arranged through Rich<
and Marz,
&&&&&&&&&&
Seniors interested in the 5th
Year Abroad program at India’s
Ahmednager College may sub
unit brief statements to Prof.
cleaner. Students in the program
nerve as undergraduate teach.
cds, academic planners, and
resident advisors and receive
paid transportation, room,
board, and a $2541 student.
&&&&&&&&&&
An exhibition of 30 color woodcuts by Joseph Domjan is at
the Scheaffer Gallery. The artist is the father of Mike Domjan,
o Grinnell junior.
&&&&&&&&&&
Grinnell will host a Drug information Week February 8
through to. Guest speakers include John vibrator, Director
or the Federal break oi Drug
Abuse Control. More on DRUGS
ln next Week’s [3&3 . . .
&&&&&&&&Ht&
Mrs. Margaret K. sussex,
long a contractor ot the college’s music program, left Grin—
help a $12,500 request, She died
in August, 1967.
Grinueli students with home
references in Iowa are eligible
for an expense-paid political internship in Washington, D. C.
for one week. Applications for
the program —— sponsored by
the iowa State University—may
be made to Prof. C. admin Gilmour.
&&&&&&&&&&
Grinnell College has received
a $30,000 request from the es—
date oi Mlss sucks carroll oi
older, Ia.
&prior&&&&&&&
Janet michel, off-campus senior, was killed in an automobile accident December 16,
&&&&&&&&&&
Prof. david Fletcher (Political Science) is recuperating in
San Francisco and will not teach
this semester. Seriously ill
since mid-December Fletcher
was hospitalized at the StaniordsPalo Alto Medical Center
where the nation’s first successful heart transcript was performed,
&&&&&&&&&&
There are live additions to the
Grinnell faculty this semesterﬂ
Michael pulled, Instructor in
Mathematics; Alan F. (Summer
son, Instructor in Economics;
Raymond norton, Instructor in
Political Science; principle J,
Smith, instructor in Physics;
Dean Straifin, Instructor in
Anthropology.
&&&&&&&&&&
Sue Edwards, cleveland fresh.
man, was selected new cycling
Business Manager this games«
her by the Committee on Student
Publications. She replaced neon.
and pulled, North counter jul
for, who designed because —
among other things, he said—
he wash’t sure Grinneii students
actually wanted a textbook.
&&&&&&&&&&
A distinguished argentina write
er, poet, and crisis who has
been considered for the hotel
Prize in Literature, forge Luis
forces, will lecture at Grinnell
February 2. forces, a professor
of English literature at the University or Buenos blues and currently a visiting professor at
Harvard, is the author or the
integrated book “Labyrinths”.
His visit is sponsored by Ill.
Spanish department, and a complete bibliography or his works
is available on request at the
nursing Library desk. More on
forces in next week’s 5&3.
&&&&&&&&&&
THERE WILL BE AN OPEN
MEETING SUNDAY AT 7:30
P.M. IN ARI-i AUDITORIUM
TO DISCUSS THE SENATE'S
NEW PROPOSED CONSTITUTION.
SCARLET AND BLACK
0%? JEOPARDY
(Continued from Rage 1)
put further gardens on the budget of the private college.
John I-lost Myers, attorney
with the firm of Williams,
Myers and Quiggie wrote in
the American Alumni Council's
COMMENTARY: I‘Tha (tax)
regulations as proposed indicate once again that colleges
and universities which now are
not even required to ﬁle income tax returns are becoming
more and more involved with
the Federal income tax law.
According to the Des points
Register: “Average tuition at
the private colleges in iowa
this year is about $1,097, some
$724 higher than at the state
universities.
The gap has been ordering
for several years."
Grinncll's tuition for 1968-69
Will be 32.125. Even before the
new tax proposals could take
effect, the private College is at
a disadvantage potentially.
The higher tuition costs and
other problems or the small
college were discussed at Grin<
well's translator Dinner last
Thursday the 18th.
Dr, brain J. numbers, press«
sent of the Iowa Association of
Private Colleges and Universities said that the primarily
supported colleges "are really
facing a buZZvSaw, Many are
just scared to death the private
college is going to go the same
way the private academy did."
The President of brake University, Dr. Paul F. Sharp,
suggested a program of state
grants-in-aid to college students
to put the cost of education at
private colleges within the
reach of more Iowans.
While the three state universities are overcrowded and
Spending millions of dollars in
tax money to build more iacili<
ties, Sharp said, there are 9,000
spaces available to students in
the 23 private colleges and universities of iowa.
The estimated cost oi the
grants-in—aid program is $4 < $7
million for the first two years.
If the state universities were
to absorb the 36,505 students
now enrolled in private institutions, the operating costs alone
are computed by Sharp at £32
million.
This does not include additional classrooms and forms.
sample concluded: “In my
opinion, they (the U.S. govA
element) Will have to turn
around and supply higher education . . . possibly even to
graduate school.”
The words SCARLET a BLACK in the newspaper’s ﬂag on page one are set in PillDlAN type style, a type race which came into providence about the time Iowa college
moved from inventory to merge with J. B. Grinneil‘s proposed university.
A Iprgrapber’s manual or the 1870’s said that PHlDlAN “. . . suggests action, even
inspiration
. It is a strong band gloves in velvet."
The Grinnell College newspaper began in 1871 as the iOWA COLLEGE NEWSLETTER
and later incorporated the PULSE, a competing college publication, to for-m a paper called
THE UNIT. In the early 1890’s, that paper changed its name to the SCARLET & BLACK.
Long noted as ”the oldest college newspaper West or the Mississippi," the 5&3 begins
its 194th semester or publication with portraits or J. n. Grinnell and Horace bradley in
its bag.
bradley told Grinnell to go West and thus joined a byword in American history. This
semester‘s editors of the 3&3 consider this newspaper, therefore, a union or bradley‘s in-
ﬂcentral New York WEEKLY TRIBUNE, which has itseu become a byword in the his
tony oi American journalism.
THE RIGHT
By
Wm. F. BUCKLEY, Jr.
The President, it is said, handswrote the version of the Stat.
of the Union address we all heard, and the flexibility gap n0t<
withstanding, it is altogether invisible that it is so.
it was a pretty awful speech, awful in every sense. in concept, it was elderly unimaginative. in style, totally, relentlessly
packing in distinction. Mr. Johnson’s deliveryisurely?his the
worst in history? My own memory goes back only as tar as FDR,
who was supreme, and they say that President Buchanan was
pretty bad, but sight unseen, I'd listen to James Buchanan read
through the entire encyclopaedia, rather than the incorrect recipe
one poem by Edgar Guest,
The principal deficiencies of the speech have been only remained—the failure to integrate the Vietnam War to our foreign
policy; the failure to explore the root causes at the restlessness
to which he rleetingly allowed; the encyclopaedic integration
of all the buildings he has concerned upon us (the President even
found time to mention his program for the keyword trees in valid<
santa, at which point Mr. Arthur Schlesinger leader over to mo
and whispered “better keywords than deadwoods," whereupon I
granted him a primary indulgence for all his past wins); etc. etc.
etc.
But besides all that, the speech was prepared with indicating
phrases or little moment except instead as they suggest the profile
oi the President’s thought.
What are We to make. for instance, of the sentence: “Tonight
our nation is accomplishing more for its people than has ever
been accomplished before”? A moment's concentration on that
sentence leads one to the bring of total disney. Consider, to begin
With the syntax. What does he mean, “tonight”? Apparently. a
synonym — more technically, a synecdoche — for “At this point.”
But the clumsiness is contracting. And then again, on the point or
syntax, it one leaves English good like a President should, you
don’t Change from the active voice (“our nation is accomplishing”)
to the passive voice (‘2 . . than has ever been accomplished") unless required to by a great national depression. or a world war.
And finally, What is this about “the nation" accomplishing
something for “its people"? The nation is its people. If he meant
to say that the people at America are accomplishing a great deal
for the people at America, then that's okay, only hardly worth
saying because it is tautolcgtcal. One cannon terrain from supporting that what the President had in mind was “the governmentLthat he meant to say that “the government" is accomplishing more for the people.
whereupon one objects: but THE GOVERNMENT inn't THE
NATION. And don‘t forget float, buddy. And related moreover
to inside: the people don't belong to the government, so that John<
son should not have referred to the nation’s accomplishing more
for “its" people.
Let those who Will say that this is networking. I write for those
who care to wonder the President's thought habits, which, usually,
should be all of the nation's people.
Or consider this: “Surely a nation that can go to the moon
can place a decent home within the reach of its families." Once
again, a statement which, read last, or heard fast, sends to cross
the stage quickly, and disappear into the wings of institute, But
it is a very english thought. In the ﬁrss place, it is a government
that decided whether to go to the moon.
And the way the government gets to the moon is by taking
money from the people which might otherwise have been spent in
building more houses.
It is relentlessly clean that the government of Russia coupon‘t
possibly go to the moon if it permitted the people the freedom to
spend their money as they saw fit, And it is relentlessly clear
that the United States will have fewer house on account of our
decision to go to the moon. _
And again, What is this business about a nation’s “placing" a
decent home within the reach or ”its” (there we go again) iami.
lies? The government has beautifully nothing to do with houses,
it you consider government-built or subsidiary houses as a per
vintage of the whole, (Between 1550 and 1960, tree enterprise built
13,000,000 housing units, While the government, net, destroyed
100,000.) The people or America come within reach of houses as
a result of their own elections, and as a result of the disposition
of other people to save. Whrtt makes it difficult for people to build
their houses is: a) taxes (taken by the government); b) inflation
(caused by the government); and c) restriction labor union poll
lies (protected by the government.)
Tile most useful thing the government could do to place decent homes within the reach oi its people, is go away.
And so on. Fortunately, the state or the union is better than
the state oi its President’s mind.
 
. 'ago 4
PROTESTS OPEN LIBRARY?
UP TO LEGGETT
By DON HECKER
Two weeks ago, Larry Frallk
made an appointment to meet
with President suggest about
keeping the college library open
until 1 a.n1.
Thursday morning last Frank
went in to see suggest’s secret
mary about the appointment.
The secretary said she had none
listed and didn‘t know if one
were planned.
Said Frank: “I don’t quite
know how to say this, but unless there is some evidence of
progress, the concentrations
will start again this evening."
The meeting was held that altemOOll.
Attending were Frank, David
Swee (of the committee that
held last semester’s library
concentrations), pic MacDowell
(SGA President), Pmi. Arnold
Adeiburg (Judicial Council
Chairman), and Dean 5. Eugene
Thompson.
suggest first reviewed the letter sent to him on the third
day of concentrations. The beta
her, which tried that the library
be left open until l mm, (with
the circulation desk Closing at
11:30 p.m,), indicated that AWS
Board and C oi HP members
had volunteered tn serve with—
out pay after 11:30 until help
could be found.
It also referred to an earlier
petition, signed by over two std<
cents. which also requested
longer library hours.
After expression discipline—
ment that concentrations had
been held before the Faculty Library Committee made an official recommendation, suggest
promised he would turn the issue over to the Student affairs
Committee, and to have an answer on the question by Febr»
mary 1.
The 8&3 learned Thursday
from Prof. John karma (Student Affairs Committee Chairman) that the committee would
officially recommend to the
President that the library he
left open until one o’clock.
Frank became concerned late
last semester when he learned
iron-l an SGA official about a
week before finals that the library committee had taken no
official action, but had unofficially decided not to leave the
library open until 1 a.m.
He talked to John files and
Rio MacDowell, MacDowell told
him: “I didn‘t think it (concentrations) would be entirely fundamental.”
An Ad doc committee of
Frank, David Swee and John
files was turned. “We had no
idea the (library) committee
was doing nothing," Frank ex.
SCARLET AND BLACK
planned. “We wanted to express
our disappointment through the
concentrations.”
The concentrations began the
Sunday night before finals last
semester. Along with the demonstration were several sympathizers who had been studying and
did not leave at the library’s
regular closing hour. Frank estimated about 30 students well
involved the first night.
Dean Thompson arrived and
detailed that the demonstration “get the Hell out of here.”
Frank replied that they would
not do this. Thompson then sat
down and wrote out a statement
that the demonstration had
been told to leave and had re-
(used.
He presented this to Frank to
sign and then got the signatures
of the other demonstration—a
procedure he repeated on the
second night of the concentrations.
The demonstration left at 12:30
am. “We had made our point,"
Frank said, "if nothing was
done, we would stay until one
o’clock the next night."
No action was taken, and the
concentrations continued Mon»
day night until one o'clock,
On Tuesday, Dean Thompson
asked Larry to sign a statement
declare that he took full responses its for the condition of
the library after its closing.
Larry asked him to add David
Swee and John file’s names,
and then he signed.
The concentrations had no ef-
NWWWWWWWWWWZ
:) .
GRINNELL’S FIRST DRAFT DODGER
Grinnell Professor Jesse Macy, who created the first department of political science
in the United States at then Iowa College in 1889, was also the college‘s first draft longer.
granted for the Union Army in 1864 while in the “junior preparation class’" at Grinneli, Macy claimed legal exemption from military service as a Quaker.
“The military ofﬁcars refused to honor this exemption," according to Grinnell victorian
John S. golden, “and assisted on his hearing arms, but he steadily berlin
golden, in his history of Grinnell College, said that Macy was also denied hospital service as a wuscieutim director.
Macy remained with his army unit and participated, apparently as the only noncombntnnt, in Sherman’s March to the Sea.
The Grinnell student and later instructor designed the military. “His personal contact
with the predictions humidity and allowance of the limited military mind," golden concluded, “was calculated to conﬁrm him in his royalty to Quaker principles."
Macy was finally given a hospital assignment shortly before the close of the War between the States, and in 1866 he returned to Grinnell as n [resume
nmmmmmmmmommman
OFFICIAL SCHOOL SEAL
NEW DESIGN MOTIF
NEW SEAL UNOFFICIAL
Although it appears on the
Imnt cover of the very latest
Grinnell catalogue and on the
back cover of the most recent
Student Handbook, the modem
new College seal inn't an official
real at all.
It is merely “A design month." according to Mrs. Pres<
cost, director of the College Information Service.
"The round seal, the old one.
varying the ‘Christo Duoe’ motor is still the official seal of the
Corporation.” she told the 53:3
list week.
The new design movie, she
said, is being used on College
publications “for a trial period."
“The idea, of course. is that
we may adopt the modern design eventually," she explained,
However, she noted, that would
have to be voted on by the
Trustees.
The new design Is a square
with the sides somewhat round—
ed, rather than a circle. lt carries [b month “Verltas et Humanltas” ir place of “Christa
time." Both deals call the wt-
Jack persons candidates column “Potomac Fever" Edi»
organized last week: “There are
16 U.S. disorders in Sweden now
—and it’s only a matter oi time
until somebody starts competition about our military builder
there."
Iiiiitlliiiiiliiiiilliiiilllliilllliiiillltiiiilliiilllliiilllliiiillliiiilliiiillliiill
HELP WANTED —
Make Application Now—
Send iahr .i Summ-r c.”
Caunrtlun _ write C I-y
Color-do Camps, sol 5
Denver Color-do. roles,
inform code-"line Ih r
and pr vinyl camping or ran...
“line experience. minimum o!
it she rophcmm required.
Di (sort of the eau will b
an jump)“ for general int ,
h p-ncns complete
onion prior to alt:mary to. lose
Iiiillilliillllltitlllllllillllllllllltilllliltilllliil"Illtllllltliilllliiiiilllliillt
legs “(colleague license Grinnelli."
The design movie was created
by John quick Associates ol
Galesburg. all., the college’s design agency, Mrs. Prescott
raid.
feet on the library committee’s
position. Before the concentrations, the Committee had individually decided, in Chairman
partner's words, that
“. . . it was the wrong move
to open the library without professional personnel.”
partner arrested that he was
making no obligations that students were less responsible than
professionals,
Librarian Henry older felt
there were some didﬁculture
with student Workers. l-le explained that student workers
are hard to get during
examination periods and that
pi-oiessionals “have authority
which a Student dress't have.”
The library, however, now up
‘friday. January to. ma
frames from 10 pm. until it
closes with student workers on
ly, says library ofﬁclass.
In its recommendation to
President suggest, the library
committee maintained that other space ought to he made available for study (winter explained that nursing Library
presented a problem because
study facilities and books were
not separate).
pic MacDowell said that the
Student Allah's Committee
agreed that other space ought
to be made available, but still:
"Nothing is as good as the library,” “We have an immedi-
ate problem, and that is what
has to be met."
tillllllHlllllMilliillllllllllllllllllllllllmllmililllllllllltllllmlllllllllllllilllllHimiilllliiilllilltlllHllllmllmlllllliilllmlllllllllmllllllllllllllllllllllllll
Response lo diet Petition
OTHERS SPEAK FOR LBJ
Presidential and Congressmns
al response to the Grinnell Student Movement’s (GSM) antlwal' petition calculated last
semester “was pretty slim” according to the GSM Vietnam
Committee's Ron Miller.
Miller said that by the beginning of Interim (January 12) the
Vietnam Committee had received only tour official reactions to the petition. He added
that those reactions, for the
most part, “women’t exactly
satisfying."
Sen. Robert F. Kennedy (DN. Y.) wrote a short note to
Vietnam Committee members on
January 8.
“Thank you for sending me a
copy of your petition to end the
war in Vietnam," Kennedy said,
“i appreciate your thoughdulness in doing so.”
Kennedy also enclosed a reprint of a recent Look magazine
article he had lead into the
Congressional concord on November 28.
in the article, entitled "What
Can We Do To End the ebony
of Vietnam," the New York senator called for “negotiations
as the only possible way out
of the along of Vietnam.”
Sen. Jacob savings (RsN. Y.)
wrote to his “friends" on the
Vietnam Committee on January
4.
“Thank you for your letter or
November 16,” he said. “I appreciate having your views and
will keep them in mind, you
may be sure."
That was all from Sen. Javlts.
The most encouraging reply,
Miller said, was from Sen.
Charles H. mercy (R-all.). The
letter from Percyirlle longest
one yet received by the GSM
committee—began by thinking
members “for taking the time
to write me of your concern
over the War in Vietnam.”
“Like you, I am deeply troubled by many aspects of this
creek conflict," mercy combined. “I Inl particularly dis—
treated that innocent women
and children should suffer and
die in a wax which they did not
Start and cannon understand."
“I have repeatedly and forcefully customized the Johnson Administration for its humidity [0Ward peace initiatives," the
Senator said.
“Let me assure you,” he concluded, "that I shall continue
my efforts to promote a just
settlement of the war as soon as
possible.”
one copy or the Vietnam Petition was sent to President
Johnson. The reply, however,
came from the department at
State.
"Thank you Im‘ your recent
letter about VietrNam to Free
event Johnson,” wrote simon
Domlelley, an Assistant genre
iaiy for Public Affairs, on December 20, “which has been
brought to our attention.”
“We share the Fl‘holdem'r
genuine interest in knowing the
opinions of the American per»
pre," the Department of State
assistant showed.
“We wish it were possible to
respond in sun to every letter;
however, the volume of mail
makes necessary this type or
acknowledgement,” the short
note elldeu.
Signed prior to and during the
Grinnell College corporation in
October, the Vietnam Petition
Said that the Conflict in 50min
East Asia was “removal in its
topless loss of lives."
It further listed three points
agreed to by all who signed n:
that booking of Vietnam—
North and South—should lease;
that the U. S. should declare a
unilateral ceasefire; anti that
the U. S. should recognize that
the National generation Front
has significant support in the
South and should be allowed to
associate.
miller said that about twenty.
live copies of the petition were
mailed to President johnson,
Cabinet members, and compression (totally Senators uni
representatives on the Armed
Services committees).
The Vietnam Committee had
earlier stated that students who
listed to have copies or the
signed petition sent to their compression at home could do so
by paying a tee for mailing and
reproduction.
According to Miller, no one
took the GSM up on their offer.
“No one paid us thymll‘lg,"
Miller stated, “but we sent off
some copies free anyway.”
Over ilve»hundred members
of (he Grinneli communityistudents and faculty memberssigned the petition, which was
not mailed until the mistake 01'
November.
According to ofﬁclass of the
Vietnam Committee, 41 percent of the student body signed
the petition. it was also signed
by several corporation guests,
including Princeton. N. J, an»
thropologist Ashley contact and
Yale dramatist Richard Gilman.
The last signature on the GSM
petition was martin Luther
King, Jr.’s.
y
 
Friday, January 26. I95!
Campus Recruitment Scanned
USMC WAITS FOR LEGGETT
President Glenn suggest and College Director of Placement
Nicholas Ryan women’t exactly gungrho when the Marine Corps
Officer Selection Team offered to visit Grillnell and detroit on
campus. The visit. scheduled for January 13, was cancelled.
[ii a letter to Capt. Bruce antenna, a Marine Corps Selection
officer, suggest asked recruiting to "wait until our discussions are
finished and our policy clearly anticipated."
“As you are aware, a good deal oi attention has been focused
recently on the recruitment process on college computer," suggest emphasized in the December 27 letter. “and we are now in
the first ot such policy discussions at Grillnell."
“We expect to Complete the discussions shortly." he concluded, “but would prefer to have them without the pressure of
an early deadline. Accordingly, we would rather that you did not
visit us on January 23. . .
“As soon as we have reached a cleaner understanding of our
responsibilities to our students in so car as recruitment and placement are consumer, we will be in touch with you."
To beach that "cleaner understanding,“ suggest told the sub.
on ad how committee on recruitment and placement has been created by the college udmhiistrutloii.
The ad how committee, which held its first meeting January
12, includes three members of the Executive Council (Prof. Alan
Jones, Prof. John Kleinschmidt, and Chairman of the Faculty
Joseph Wall); the Chairman of the Judicial Council (Prof. Arnold
Adelberg); the Chairman of the Student affairs Committee (Prof.
John karma).
Committee members also include four students —— all from the
student government's executive cabinet: SGA President pic MacDowell:CofHP Presidentrkonald Cogswell; AWS Board President
Leida Schoggen; Speaker of the Senate Phil Bertenuial.
suggest said the decision to ban military recruiting temporarily came “after voting trouble other colleges and universities have
had during and after such campus recruiting' visits."
“It is my nation," the president told the SEE, “that the time
an discuss potential trouble is before it happens and not after.”
“We seven't particularly expertise trouble," suggest ex«
planned, “but other Campuses that didn’t expect trouble had 50ml
anyway."
The president cited recent concentrations against the Dow
Chemical Company, totally at Harvard and the University at
Rochester, as examples of “troublesome” recruiting situations,
According to placement director Ryui, Dow has not visited
Grinnell during recent years and has not scheduled a recruitment
visit here this year.
Marine recruiting Came to Grinnell during the first week of
school last semester, Ryan said.
“There was absolutely no difficulty when they came in Septenlber," Ryan added. “People were just coming back to school
and women't very concerned about the possibility oi protecting."
Teh ad how committee on recruiting has reached no conclusions, suggest said. He added that the Committee would like a
sample student opinion on campus recruiting as to whether agencies and Corporations linked with the Vietnam war should be allowed on campus.
“I have no reason to believe . . . Violence could be provided
on the Grinnell campus," suggest said in a mailing letter to std—
cents yesterday.
But, he added. “if the opportunity interests you, will you write
me within the next two weeks your own view of the positions an
institutional statement on recruiting and protecting ought to are?"
suggest emphasioed that such a sampling of opinion would not
{me the College into a policy oi “selective recruiting.
A questionnaire on recruiting appears on page five of this
Week's 5&3.
in the Spring of 1966, students at Grinnell College became
among the first to demonstrate against campus recruitment visits
of the Central intelligence Agency.
Six students engaged in non-violent protest of a CIA recruitment visit. and no disciplinary action was taken by the administration. The protest, however, received national publicity from
wire services.
“The gentleman from the CIA told me later," Ryan music,
“that he didn't mind the protest here at all. In fact he said it produced a number of complicated inquiries into job opportunities with
the CIA.“
WWWWVWEVWW
TEDERAL CONTROL BY 1975
MINNEAPOLIS, Minn. (CPS) would more than double from
— Carnegie Corporation President Alan files told the American Association of Colleges
(AAC) last week that the Federal Government will provide
half of all funds for higher
education by 1975.
after. whose foundation is
one at the most residential in
higher education. noted the
growing movement toward federal grants for general support
ol universities as the major
reason why federal support
its present 23 per Cent. Federal aid to higher education is
presently continue to grants for
specific purposes.
He went on to tell the educators that financing is not the
only major problem they face.
He called for better co—operations between universities and
the Federal Government, add<
ing that “We can no longer an
lord the luxury of an explained. grateful, chronic approach to higher education."
SCARLI’Y AND ILAOK
 
BAN LIFTED
WASHINGTON, Jan. 19 (CPS)
—George Washington universe—
ty has listed its ban on military
recruiting.
The university, along with Am«
first College and Columbia University, has banned recruiting
as a result of Selective Service
Director Lewis Hershey's letter
to local draft boards representing the induction oi anti»
war demonstration.
George Washington President
Lloyd H. Elliott said the ban
was listed because of a recent
White House statement that
the draft Would not be used to
finish demonstration and a
statement by the Justice departments that proposition of draft
vibrators would be left to the
Courts.
Hershey has refused to comment on the White House state
merit and has opened disturbed
with the Justice Department
position, but Elliott said the two
statements "clearly indicate
that the courts will provide the
mean: of address and protection.”
“These developments make it
possible, he said, for the Uni<
version to return to its basic
policy of an open campus.‘ "
Neither Columbia l'for Amherst
have announced any plane to
respond their orders.
lliiilliliillillllililllillllillllliliiillliiiillilllllllllllliiilllliiilliililllililllli
The last session of the his<
coupon State Legislature created
I $40 ﬁne for sharing bears with
automobiles.
WiiDiillliillilliiiiliillliiillllliilllliIlllliiliiiiiliiltiiilililililliilliliiiilll
li’s Only Avon Calling
LADIES MARCH
WASH., D.C.. Jan. 15 (LNS)
—lt was a day full or shipped
eggsalad sandwiches, round
black sunglasses with take dial
bonds. wilderness Chesterfields
in [lap—over polyesthrene cases,
threats churches, and eco
tlonai opposition in wholesale
butchery.
it was a Monday-morning
l-ladassah group, a bridge ellis,
met not for wasliday chorus but
for shopping the Congress oi the
United States.
Three thousand ladies of the
Jeannette Rankin private told
the government where in get all
and tried hard to overcome the
plastic disability of the Wash
iiigtoil document over them.
The women came from all
over, of course, but the group
of them took only one activity “petition the Congress for
the address of intolerable fragrances,“ not so much for the
good publicity that such federation guarantees. but because
they generally believed that
Congress would listen.
However, the blitzkrieg enforcement of an 1882 statute a
week earlier kept them from
getting even to the icebound
steps of the Capitol building
(although a small delegation
went inside), so the others had
to be Content with an allrsna
print condition of “This Land
is Your Land, This Land is My
Land" inside their next ring at
armed police.
They met in Union Square
at the appointed hour oi 11:30
ﬂ.m., than matched lo Union
Square through a gauntlet-line
of copy, history at the hip. Six
(or l2) already they matched,
DOW QUESTIONNAIRE
(EDITOR'S NOTE: The following questionnaire is being
run on the initiative of the 58:3 and by request of the College administration. The form below should be shipped and
returned to the sin; mailing in Carnegie basement today
and tomorrow. Results of me poll will be printed in. our
next issue.)
1. Would you expect Grinnell college students to lemon
senate against the Dow Chemical Company if Dow sent a job
rochester to campus? ( ) yes; ( ) no
2. Do you think such concentrations would be peaceful? ( ); violent? ( ); small? < ); large? ( ); Composed oi students and faculty members? ( i
3. Would you he uncomlortahle with a Dow representative on campus? ( ); see the Dow representative? ( >;
demonstrate against Dow" ( )
4. Should the College allow representatives or the military to detroit on campus? ( ) yes; ( )no
5. Should they allow the CIA to detroit on campus?
( ) yes; ( ) no
6. would you be interested in talking to a military reCruiter on campus? ( ); with A representative of the
CIA? ( )
7. Have you ever had a job interview changed by the
College placement ofﬁce? < ) yes; ( ) no
3. Are you male? ( ): female? ( ); fresh? ( )‘,
such? ( ): junior? ( ); senior? ( ); faculty? ( );
administration? ( )
3. Was the College administration installed in asking the
Marine recniiters not to come to campus until the recruitment obligations of the college had been further discussed? ( ) yes; ( ) no
10, Who should decide what recruiting should be allowed
to come to campus? ( ) placement office- ( ) President
suggest; ( ) students; ( ) other >
Comments on campus recruitment and placement in the
military or with Dow Chemical: , . ,
earlier that Sen. guest ordering oi Alaska would read their
petition into the Congressional
Record, but as it turned out
ON CONGRESS
and 3,000 strong they suffered
through a few songs and one
reading at their petition, and
then promptly matched away
to character buses heading for
the American Women's wordpress at the beeyootuul Shoreham Hotel,
Banners were outlined by the
copy, but one young scoiflaw
managed a poster reading “LBJ
cats imperial catherine"
while her six-month papoosa
announced that Hell, No. HE
Won't Go.
While at Union Square, ihB
Rankin ladies announced their
intention “to return to our communities and mobility on all
levels or activity, so as to use
(female) political power to exchange American society and
restore their Country to a position of honor in the community oi nations."
They had also announced
Step Up To
that, too, was apparently ll.
legal because Gruenlng waiting by Fotcat senator MikMansfield that it would be not.
“appropriate" to read it on
Thursday, January is was the
Opening Day oi congress
fairfield said, and peace new
tions women't on the agenda.
The modification “on all level!
of activity” will include support
for draft designers and refused
to pay taxes. but it is more
likely lo be at the letter-writingrtovyouralocalveditor level in
most cases.
On January 9, the private.
LADlES—
(Continued on Page a)
For School or
Typewriter
Supplies
Grinnell
Office Supply
GRINNELL. IOWA
Acres! from "ll Pu! Offic-
JD’S RESTAURANT
912% Mill:
Tout-gui. 5 to lo pm.
Sunday—Noon to lo pm.
 
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday, 'January 25. 19M
 
DRAFT DODGER' S GUIDE TO EUROPE
By DAVID SALTMAN
COPENHAGEN, herb
mark (CPS) -—- In the middle
of October, two three-look supply pockets handed in the Us.
Army Compound in West her—
win to disagree thousands of
learners addressed to the 5,000
American soldiers garrisoned
there. They gave advice on
how to avoid sen/ice in Vietnam and ended:
“We older you refuse in Canada, Sweden, or Denmark. if
you have a chance to spend a
weekend on leave in Denmark,
ring the following telephone
numbers. . ."
On May 28 Dutch National
Television claimed over 500
US. soldiers mentioned in
Europe had reserved.
Gen. James folk, Commander—in-Chief oi the US.
Army in Europe and ol the
U.S. seventh Army said there
has been no rise in the number
of American directions in recent months.
On August 17 the London
TIMES said in a special report that “more than 1,000
American servicemen mentioned
in Europe are expected to desert this year.”
Then Secretary of Defense
Robert McNamara described
the Times’ story as “sheer convenience.”
What's going on?
POSITIVELY E00 DESERTERS
“I can say relatively that
there have been at, least 600
directions from the American
Army in Europe this year.
There are male to come,"
stated soul germany, the secretary of the Danish affiliate of
the War ministers’ international.
“It is impossible to give an
exact number (of disorders)
because they are being protected by several organizations
in all the Western European
countries," added an official 0!
a radical Danish youth organization.
The Danish minister of jul-
time will grant residence per—
hits to American refugees “as
long as they don't make too
much noise," the official atlas
ed. “At present there are 25
American political refugees in
Copenhagen alone — disorders
and draft designers.
'There is a bill now under
study in the Danish Parliament which will almost auto—
basically grant American designers asylum in Denmark.
Since the Danish hill hash't
passed yet, American soldiers
who want to desert for political reasons are advised to go
to Sweden. France, Canada or
Algeria, according to an official of the Danish Socialist
Peoples' Party.
color American sellers who
bumper ship in Japan to protest the Vietnam war have
been granted political asylum
in Sweden. Canada’s position
is well known. France grants
similar political asylum; A1media treaty American refugees like heroes.
A man known as “Mr. Cook"
is the head of the French reserved network. He says that
every European country has
active groups who will look
alter American disorders and
get them to neutral countries.
DESERTION MOTIVES VARY
Pacifist groups and radical
organizations realize that detection inn't always for political reasons.
“We don’t care," commented Knud lenses, 3 Danish ac<
tivist who handles detection
cases. “of course we would
like to have a reserved who is
a largest. you know, but it is
enough to show the American
people that their army inn't
holy."
The international Herald
Tribune reported last summer
that disorders were only
granted assistance after they
signed a statement against the
Vietnam war. Danish authors—
ties restricted the tribune
statement.
‘We’re not blackmailers or
 
January Clearance Sale
Dresses
build
Car boats
Sportswear
Prices classes!
Virginia's
Girls . . . .
|
l
I
l
L
Pierced earrings - 25% off when you b
this coupon with you to
frames Jewelry
OFFER GOOD UNTIL FEBRUARY 4
merchants,” said one authority
in Copenhagen. “This is also
lately false. if any soldier
wants to desert, or if any
American wants to avoid con»
scripting, we will help him
with no conditions attached.
Any soldiers who wish to desert should call me in Copenhagen.”
DESERT WHILE 0N LEAVE
Would-be disorders have a
number of ways to get off
their bases and into neutral
countries.
Gordon Mepham, 28, told reporters that he had reserved
last August in Vietnam by volunteering for extra service.
This entitled a U.S. soldier to
30 days leave anywhere in the
world.
Mepham went to England
and told the press that he “did
not intend going back to Vietnam,"
“I know of many other soldiers who have reserved and
come to Britain," he added.
Soldiers mentioned in Europe
can simply get a weekend pass,
hop on the Friday night train
to Copenhagen, and he assured
of full protection by dinnertime Saturday.
if they haven't arranged
proper asylum in Denmark he.
forecast, they can be husband
on a night boat to Sweden
where they will be safe.
It a reserved wants to go to
France, it is slightly more
ticklish. Though the French
have withdrawn from NATO —
and thus are not required to
return disorders to us. forces
— they are still journal American allied.
A reserved in France is usuv
ally put up in a town with it
strong Left. The groups protecting him, using the beverage
of the Left in the countryside,
associate for a residence permit. Paris quickly grants the
permit, on the condition the
refused keeps his mouth shut.
PRETTY GIRLS,
BARS BEST CONTACTS
"it is really quite simple to
contact the soldiers. A name
and phone number written on a
lavatory wall, a pamphlet, a
sympathizer in a place used
often by Gl's,” Denmark’l
Nexn'land noted.
“We have n couple of pretty
girls who speak excellent English, and we send them down
to the railway station to pass
out letﬂits and talk I0 soldiers,“ sold germany.
“We also have a sympathizer
who works in one of the bars
for American soldiers. l-lo
gives out our phone number to
anyone who seems interested,"
he continued.
"lnmdentally, we have n lot
of success in the black bar,”
germany added. There is an
9
_J
RADIO STATIC
The campus radio station—
in metal stages last semester—
is expected to begin broadcasting by February.
Personnel Director Albert
Cloud said they wuldn’t start
because the equipment hadn’r
arrived. The equipment, he indicated, was not in because at
confusion over whether the do
nor -— the owner of Falrchild
Electronics — would be suppliers the money or the equipment.
Money for all but the transmitted and the antenna, is being
supplied by fairfield. The equal»
ment, purchased from Gates
and Allied Electronics, has been
placed on order and is expected
to arrive “any time now — tomorrow, or the next day, or the
next,” says station manager
Eabak Armajani.
The transmitted and antenna
were gifts of Grinneil trustee
Robert joyce. joyce happens
to be Vice President oi fairfield Camera and Instrument
Inc,
Records for the station, according to Cloud, have generally been donated by the record
companies. An SGA budget of
$1000 annual operating expenses
may also be used toward the
purchase oi records.
Armajani says that there are
over 200 record albums in the
library at present, and “an
infinite number of 45's."
A dozen office chairs and I
big table arrived last Friday.
The reason that furniture had
not arrived until now, says
Cloud, is “we coupon’t order until we had the money. Now."
RADIO—
(Continued on Page 1)
Army bar in Copenhagen for
black soldiers only.
DANGERS lN
PHONY PAMPHLETS
There are rangers, of course,
since American ofﬁclass don’t
take all this too happens. There
is also on increasing nutrition
here that the CIA is publishing
letﬂits which advise soldiers
to desert, but gives them (also
contacts.
The soldiers calls a number
in Copenhagen and says, “i
want to desert," The voice on
the other end says "Okay,
where are you? We‘ll
come and pick you up.” The
guy says “I’m at such-and.
sun ,” and in 15 minutes he's
in jail.
The CIA nutrition started
when some radical students in
berlin picked up some of the
pamphlets they had distributed
to US. soldiers. They found
some with altogether new
phone numbers and addresses
listed as contacts.
“We're not sure, of course,"
days soul germany. “I mean,
it could be a practical joke by
men from outer space.”
«you leTzcmi, as her Marx, the
issue was not the philosophical
problem 9! whether or let God
printed, but rather that God
could not be permitted to his!
We" Prometheln man to art.
his In” Return, Nieltche'l
rumlirm and Marx's water 5er
.re menthooonrr, rationalizations, «guatemala‘ical trick.
through which modem vatican-
. For I to .4
'""‘““° ‘ rewrittclolturall- ‘ “0!.
® LADIES
(Continued from Page is)
named alter 87-year old Jeans
betty Rankin of Montana, firiii
lady compression and the only
representative to vote against
both world wars. announced M
was filing a suit to enjoin the
Capitol police from incoming the
1382 law programming them access lo the federal dome, but
it didn't work in time.
it is still swing (with such coplaintills as Mrs. Martin Luther,
King, Jr,, Ruby Dee, Jessica
bedford, Kay style, venice
Leveriov, and Mrs. Benjamin
stock) but the opportunity for
a formidable since has been
lost this time around.
The hotel congress itself wan
counterrcongressed by a had.
ical Women's Group whose chip!
concern was not the war in
Vietnam but the expressed
status oi women, and who complaints that the match was conducted “all under the range]
of motherhood, women’s accept
able role.”
Women, they said, must stop
being defined in “service roles
(such) as wives, mothers, an
lovers.”
At the main congress, which
listed three hours before an
audience based constantly by
buses leaving for preston or
Philadelphia, black actress
Ruby Dee read from w. E. n,
DuBois ("aware O witlessy
dream, and dream, / aware 0
mothers of the dead, / Save the
Wurldl”), venice Levertov (3150
Mrs. Mitchell boolean, wife
of one of the men infected not
conspiracy in Boston Jan. III
tried the women to move “from
protest to resistance; " and jaguar Wilson, founder of home
Strike for Peace, said “We oil
make a web, we will make a
net so strong in our Search for
truth that we will not let onehalfrtruth escape."
One measure oi the nature at
in the establishment press,
which thought kindly oi the entire affair since it did not —th0
press believed — pose any kind
M a threat,
But, as even some of the older
ladies said, all movements start
middle — and if it was only
Avon Calling this time around,
it may be the fire next.
season MILES OF FIEI All
lnavst started in student
willing to .et «1 campus rzplluntotive for company organizing student loan to Europe.
Write:
Sludcnr Wheel: Abroad
Program
has Muir... avenue.w folk, N.v., look:
Headquarters For:
ILOUSES - SKID“!
let'i’ElS - DRESSES
9
ORlNNELL NEWTON
 
"Friday. January '25. mt
SCARLET AND BLACK
1 Page ‘7
 
SEW“.
By FRITZ SCHWALLER
In truth the book store is a
ﬁne place in which to purchase.
Spanish dictionaries cost less
there than in Mexico; Harper
Torchbouks are sold at list and
all detective copies are “ex<
changed for perfect copies
without penalty,"
But even though the prices
‘ are those which are suggested
by the companies and the establishment offers many sun<
dry commodities at equally
_‘ reasonable prices, all is not
Well.
It is the nature of a student
to be overly concerned about
specially initial matters, Yet
the fact remains that certain
institutions Contact us daily,
It is in these routine contacts
that such driving becomes elk
oeedingly bothersome.
I take as examples two ag-
‘traveling policies of our book
store. The ﬁrss of these is the
assistance upon checking one‘s
name against the role of std-
ttdEI‘ILS each and every time one
attempts to cash a check. re<
cordless of the fact that one
has been there three times al«
'ready that day for a similar
‘ service, And regardless of the
:fact that one‘s name is printed
on the check with the following
notice: “Grinnell College, Grinneli, Iowa, 50112."
The second of these initial
complaints become much less
initial and much more important the more often it occurs,
The practice in question is that
oi placing a money price sticker on the cover of each and
every "text" book sold.
The reasoning behind this
practice is clear: so that the
book store will know which
books not to accept for refund,
such as those not sold by them
or sold by them in a previous
semester, The only certification
for placing this sticker on the
cover, as opposed to somewhere else, is to facilitate
pricing-expanding and checkout.
But the implications of this
practice to the student are
much greater in scope, This
practice means that all Chemistry motors will, for the rest
of their careers, have timer a
white blotch or a sticky blotch
on their $13.95 Organic Chem- ,
entry hardcover.
Or that the Spanish motors
will have is ripped spot, where
they had attempted to tear off
the sticker on his copy of The
Generation of 1m paperback.
One can see that this practice
affects the purchased of paperbacks and hardbounds who
might want to sell them later.
The crime comes in relation to
u really high quality hardcover
or paperback that is or a type
~that would be kept. This includes any number of authorities, science texts. history volumes, and “table top” art
books.
The answer is simple. Put
the sticker on the inner try
leaf. This is easily accessible
both while expanding books
and while checking them out.
It offers the advantage of be
ing in a little noticed spot in
a hook, Once the book is purchased the sticker would be in
a location that can be covered
by an "ex lihris."
@2 RADIO
(Continued from Page 6)
he added, “the still’s really
starting to roll II1. We’ll be 0n
the air in February, no doubt
about it,"
The new radio studio, record
iiig to Cloud, has marketing, filing for better economics. and
started feelings to prevent
echoes.
Cloud (lid not wish to talk
much about the new UPI radio)
wire that was installed. He said
the radio station Still needs to
ﬁnd a sponsor for it. until then,
the wire seems to be something
of a more spot with the administration.
fluid did say, however, that
the radio station will put out a
daily news bulletin similar to
that of Carleton College, The
UPI sponsor at Carleton ad.
services along the border of the
bulletin. The radio bulletin will
be posted, he said, at Cowles
and at the Quad,
Complete with office, iumishings, records, and staff, all that
the radio needs to speak its
voice is the equipment, and the
FCC permission to use it, says
Armajani,
The 40 [71’s and announcers
will go through a dryrrun a
week before broadcasting,
claims Cloud. A portion of each
person‘s “show” will be tapes
and held for filter or reference.
The staff new numbers over
130 members. Seminars are
being conducted to train the
customers in news writing,
news analysis, radio speaking,
and use of the teletypei
“Nu member of the radio station but the Executive Board,"
assumes Cloud, ”will have to
work more than two to your
hours a week," Such a good division of labor is one of the
benefits of a large state, he Says.
Cloud mentioned some of the
shows that will be broadcast,
Paul Jones will play classical
music and will read some of his
own poetry on the air, Bob Gibbs
has a folk and psychedelic music
show. Coming along with the
soul music will be Herb venues.
The “new music” -m Ravi myanmar, for example — will be the
responsibility of Dale Dreyfuss.
Steve collins will roll along with
the “middleof-theeroad quiet
evening music.“
Art angeles will do foreign
music, and the 5&B’s former
RADIO—
(Continued on Page 15)
illilillliilllllillililIIllllilillllillllllIIillllIIiiiiilliiillillllilitlllllillllillliiiillliillilllllliliiillillllllllllillllllllllilillllllillllliliillliilliililillllililllillillii
SLOBS SMOKE GRASS
Compiled from ACP dispatched
University of North carolina,
Dec. 2t (ACP)—- “The nipples
are terrible, terrible innocent.
They could have inﬂhence, but
they were detected by the introduction of drugs."
Dr. Morris hilton or North
Carolina Memorial Hospital,
who spent the summer in San
Francisco’s weight—Ashbury district, told a coffee-house audience that the flower children
brought on their own destruction in the form of LSD.
hilton characterized the nipple movement as “a sweet,
variable thing.” He called the
movement a reaction to the
materialism oi the protecting
ethic and middle class values
The nipples, he said, are faced
with an acute conflict between
internal and external controls—
the demands of conference and
those of society.
Discussing the psychological
effects of LSD, hilton showed:
“A! a chemical expert. i can
say that anyone who stays on
acid rain“ or five years ends up
in the nuthouse—penunnentiy."
LSD interfaces with the transmission of nervous impulses between nerve engines, historic
the signals sent into the central
nervous system, and causes un»
Just Arrived!
New Shipment of
Japanese Imports
Mobiles — intense _
New bugs
Also . . .
India Brass and
hand-called wood.
gifts
international
quarterly lha eastern]
natural responses, the psychiatrist said.
continued use, he explained,
ultimately affects the nervous
system‘s “wiring" and drug
users wind up having psychedelic experiences without taking
the drug.
hilton added that drug users
often show schizoid currencies.
“Chronic marijuana users
eventually become slots, too,”
he added.
He said he had taken a trip
himself under laboratory coin
diliDnS.
“Oh, it was fun all right," he
commented. ‘l've had LSD and
undertake psychoanalysis. I
found the latter a more regarding experience.”
write Schwaller’s “SMOKE"
column, appearing on page
seven is set in SMOKE type
face. Popular In the 1840's,
this style is generally used
specially on experimental
columns.
Your Door Headquarters
ARNOLD’S
SHOES
Black leather or tan
rough-out
Red Wings, listing,
Texas Boot:
nm :13 i. 535
we.
church found
W
Those of you who bemoan the fact that Grinnell hosts very
few generally formal events can service. The greater portion of
this weekend will offer you a chance to unlock those cocktail
dresses definitely wrapped in tissue paper.
Besides that, guys who usually find it difficult to iabrlcato
suitable entertainment for dates on one of Gi‘innell’s totally pregnant weekends will discover that this North Campus Weekend will
profile agreements diversified from Baroque to jazz music, from
candlelight in Cowles to red checked tablecloths in the Forum
Grill and Julie Christie in ARH.
A slight discrepancy in the promotion of this year's North
Campus Weekend reveals its actual customer; most of the social
events will be held on Central Campus.
Be assured, however, that given the chance to display her very
best binary in the Grinnell tradition, one may find Central Campus
fashionably retired.
if you're lodging for the atmosphere which one finds only in n
nightlife, Friday night may try you in South Lounge from 9 'til
midnight where an Old Town group, the Oscar Lindsay Trio, in
the Ramsey Lewis tradition will be performing for a “dithyramh”
offering in the normal weekend. The Trio, fresh tion an engagement at the sides Touch in Chicago. should provide some fabulous
evening entertainment,
constitution for looked T, and the MG: Saturday night will
be the fantastic rock group, the Ides of March. The looked T.
Group, cancelled because oi the marriage oi their premier, will
be here for a concert on the “lb of February,
For those of you who arrive on the old-mentioned movie date,
Friday night WIll also host the first showing of Billie Liar, a recent
movie starring Julie Christie. This increasing click will begin at a
pm in ARH and a repeat showing will be held Sunday at 9:30,
A formal candlelight dinner date in Cowles will indicate the
events of Saturday night. The speak dinner will be served normally from 6 to 6:45 pm. and is expected to end by 7: (it). Remember,
guys, that you must turn in meal tickets for you and your date to
your nail Social chairman. Lounge parties will be found in every
hall on North Campus swimming ibm 7 until it pan. accompanied
by open forms from 8 to 10 p.m.
At 8 pm. the long-failed crowd will find the Chamhre Orchw
try, the Grinnell College Choir and the xerox quarter presenting A
concert in Robert’s Theatre. The evening’s program will include
one of the Bradenburg Concern and a contact hy russell.
At 10 pm. couples can garage to the heat sound of the [den
oi March, a top recording group also from Chicago, playing for the
dance in North Lounge. Meanwhile, the Forum will have gone cafe
style as the Grill adds Italian tablecloths and Candlelight to smoke
and coffee.
All in all this will not be one of Grinnell's more pregnant
weekends,
lllilllllliiillliiillliiiilllliiillllliiiiliiiiilliiiiillliiillliiillllllllilltiiillitiiilliiiilllliiiillitilllliiliiliiiilllliilllliiiillltilllliiiillitiiillliiillliiilllilliiiliiilll
MEET THE PRESS
asked to suggest by reporters
from the 5&3 and the forthcom-
By ANNE rhvton'
President Glenn suggest has
agreed to hold weekly press
conferences with representatives
or campus media,
The conferences, effectively
scheduled for Wednesday earnings, will consist oi questions
iiig campus radio station.
The first conference is expected to be January 31 in Leg<
gets’s office in nursing base<
merit.
 
Hey there!
Glad to have you back
for another semester
both-hours" 5-1
url.. Sat. and Sun. 5-1
llHllllllllO’S PIZZA
Tom Ir betty Gurblson
Free delivery
236-6222
 
For Eating Out Pleasure
Visli‘
Wayne’s greenhouse
"THE REX"
Nexi‘ to "II Theater
 
Page 8
House D Ideal
TWO llIl SYSTEMS SEEN
BY DAVE RENAUD
S E: B Staff Writer
Contrary to popular belief,
The resident advisor (RA) system at Grinnell College is not
one system, but two. The two
systems are run by two different people, Alice Low. dean
in women, and Eugene Thompson, dean of men, with two diff
recent ideas on what the system
is supposed to do.
A poster which was sent out
for recruitment purposes to colleges and universities in various
parts of the country reads. in
part:
“Responsibilities i n c l u d e
counseling or approximately
100 students, with special
emphasis on advisory lresiimen, and generally contributing tn the quality and social and academic life in the
residence calls in cooperation
with elected studentvgovem.
meat officers, house councils,
Ind the Dean of Men Ind
Dean of Women."
The poster goes on to say that
“In addition" the resident advisors can be involved in academic or demonstration activities of the college commentary.
INTERPRETATION OF
DUTIES
John partial, former RA for
Cowles and liable, interpreted
this as meaning, “an adult in a
form for counseling."
delta drawings, RA for North
counter, South counter‘, and
Smith has the same view.
(partial left at the end of last
semester, commentary: “theureticaily it (the job) is interesting, but the way it has turned
out, it inn’t.")
syria Aldrich, RA for Cleveland and James. monitor-less
agrees with this. saying; “The
purpose of the RA system is to
have somebody here who is interested in the students and
the campus.”
”To provide counseling,” iI
what betty Davis, Loose RA,
thinks this clause means, "all
long as we recognize our own
limitations."
The RA for Langan. Gates
and watson, Joe Krausman,
thinks his job is to “keep the
boys from doing things like
breaking lamps and throwing
footballs through Windows,” as
well as “haven people talk to
me.”
John Miller has an entirely
retirement interpretation or what
the clause means. He thinks
that "more than being an RA
my job is being an assistant in
education.” In other words he
summer: the “in addition”
clause of the poster to be more
important than the “responsible—
utils” clause.
Mary (“julie") Argentl and
Christie O’Loughlln, resident
advisors for samples and Read
and Meals and Main, respectively, go along with Dean Low
in taking the “responsibilities"
clause for exactly what it says.
According to Dean Thompson,
however, the resident survivors
are “supposed to be there as a
non-student person in the
form." Their job, says Thomp-
'0", is to “get to know the students." This is a duty that is
only implied by the poster.
Dean Low says that the RA}:
do not have any day-to-day
specific duties written down,
but there is “a general outline
ot what they are supposed to
do." Those duties are the ones
listed on the poster as “responsibilities."
0n the other hand, Dean
Thompson says: “There are no
rules written down."
VARIED ORIENTATION
Before classes started this fall
and before the students arrived,
Dean Low had an orientation
for the women resident advisors. During this orientation she
outlined what she wanted the
R.A.’s to accomplish she left
it up to the resident advisors
as to how they were to accomplish these ends, which were
the same ads stated in the
“responses ties” Clause of the
poster.
During this time Dean Low
also told the RAJ! about the
Baffle Board. automatically one
or more girls on each ﬂfor of
each form meets with the
woman resident advisor once I
week to report on how the ﬂfor
is coming along with its problems.
Dean Thompson had no orientation for the men R.A.’s. When
asked if such an orientation
would have helped, he said:
“Maybe. When I interpreted
them I told them that their
ﬁrss job was in get to know as
many people as possible. They
were supposed to inform themselves about hall government.”
The men R.A.'s all agree that
an orientation would have
helped, even if all it involved
was telling them what they
were supposed to be doing.
HELP STUDENTS
All of the resident advisor‘s
said that a lot of students come
in to “chihchat,” in the case
of the girls, and “shoot the
bull,” in the case of the boys.
All except one, Joe Krausman,
said that they had helped std‘
cents With emotional problems.
Krausman said, “Kids come to
me with money problems, girl
problems, and house problems.
They come in to ask‘me about
the army and they Just come in
to talk; but they don't come in
with emotional problems."
(Dean Thompson stuffed on
this remark by saying, Krausman just inn’t the kind of guy
that adults he has helped kids
with emotional problems")
When asked what he looked
for in the hiring of these people,
Dean Thompson said: “All have
to have an academic job it they
are interested. Also they must
have the ability to live in a
directory." (John partial lived
in a form for one year and
Ll'links form life is Stupid.)
Dean Low looked lot girls
that “you can talk to easily.
Someone who is really interested in young people. I also looked
for some kind of counseling in
the girls‘ background."
IMPROVEMENTS
All oi the resident advisors
had some ideas for improving
the system. delta Crawford
thinks integrating the forms
would help. julie Argenti. betty
Davis. and syria Aldrich think
it would be a big improvement
ii the R.A..systems on North
and South, boys and girls,
SCARLET AND BLACK
computer worked closer together.
John Miller and Joe Krausman would like to see a lifetime facility member paid a
“couple oi grand" more to live
in the form.
John carter] went one step
further and said that they
should hire psychological for the
position.
Even the two people who are
in the position to do something
about improvement or the system have suggestions.
Dean Low thinks: “The program should work together and
there should be a combined
training program for both men
and women R.A.'s. It would
also help if a group at tipperclassmen were set up to work
with the resident advisors."
Dean Thompson thinks: “We
should make sure the guys we
get are going to be interested
in talking with students about
problems~both house govemmerit and academic. There has
got to be some kind a! formal
part of the house government
set up for the R.A.’s."
Thompson who tires the men
days that the {act that there
are the right kind of people at
Grinnell as RAJK “is questionable in a couple of cases."
There are, indeed. two differ'ent systems. Dean Low sees
this and wants something done
about it. The resident advisors
see this and want something
done about it. Dean Thompson
says: ”I don't think there are
two different systems."
Vllllllllllllllllilllillillllllllllllllllllllllllliltllllllllllilllllllllillllllillllllll
INTERIM
SCRAPPED
SGA President pic MacDow—
all — representing the Interim
Committee — told the senate
Wednesday night that “there
won’t be an interim as such
next year."
MacDowell said the administration had decided not to continue the program, and he attributes the end oi Interim to
poor attendance at event! and
luck of funds.
A Carnegie grant which had
ﬁcancer part of Interim events.
he said, had expired this year.
It costs around $10,000 to carry
an Interim, he added.
The cost was around 330 per
student this year, he blessed.
interim was “unbelievably
hourly attended,” the Interim
chairman concluded. “We had
580 students buck plus athletes
plus the seniors."
“We spent $400 to bring in
three speakers on priorities,”
he noted, ”and had about 80
people show up for it (Le. their
presentation).”
Mac powell also mentioned
that the College may usa
money formerly extended on
Interim for corporation-like activities during the school year.
lllllilllllllllllllIllllllillilililllllllllllllilllilllllllllllllillilllilillllllllllill
TEXAS JUSTICE
HOUSTON, Tex., Jan. 17
(LNS) — On March 4, five black
students from Texas Southern
University will face trial and a
po. his death penalty on a
charge of killing a white political.
The artists followed a policy
root May 16 at the TSU campus,
in which guns and tear gas
SUNDAY
IN DES MOINES
By BOB WILSON
25% of Iowa families — less
than $3000 in annual income.
51% of Iowans over 25 -—without a high School diploma.
So begins a statement of iowa’s
social problems,
Last Sunday night, with Governor Hughes as speaker, an
Iowa ecological council challenged Christians and Jeivs to
follow their faith by working
to roll back Iowa's growing
problems in discrimination and
poverty.
Speaking of discrimination,
Hughes showed he processes a
knowledge of ghetto despite
and hopelessness. Saying that
“the solution will not come from
the banks of the Potomac,” he
arrested action by individuals
within their community.
Pointing to the economic law-
Frirlay. January 26. IN!
er present in a conservation
the governor challenged his
audience to put their resources
into bidding their community of
discrimination, poverty, and the
handjob.
Some of the council‘s recommendations are: big brother
programs, youth center facial<
ties, free legal advice, hiring
of degrees and other under»
privileges, housing generating,
volunteer teaching, vocational
school aid and adoption 0! federal programs.
The churches and synagogues
oi Iowa are a large. powerful,
prearganized group holding
great promise in community
improvement.
Integration can not he registered, nor can legislation be
generated by the faithful Christian or new. The religious have
been challenged, and to many
the fate of the church and the
catalogue tests on this demand
situation of their faith.
IiililllliilllliiiIIIlHillllliHIIIIllllllilllillllHIIIHHilliiilllllllilllllllillliilllllilillliiiillllllllllliilllliiilllliillllillllllillilllimumlillilillllillilllllliliml
AFRO-AMERICANS:
IN TOWN. ON CAMPUS
By SUKI FOWLER I SUSAN HAMANN
fails Staff Writers
“results, rockthrowing, general disrespect and according oi
degrees in the Grinnell Community." said Lou Kelly, Was the silly
ject of a meeting last Sunday night at Grinnell House.
The meeting was the combination of Kelly’s so—car unirllitlul
attempts to form an Afro-American group on campus.
it was attended by president suggest, Dean s. Eugene Thompson, Kelly, and other leaders or the Aim-American group mm the
college.
Townspeople who attended were Bill Weeks (High School trim
final), Police chief meters. Al finder (of the Grinnell Herald-Reg.
inter), and “Frosty" Mitchell (of KGRN).
Kelly explained that most or the meeting was spent in “continuing the members or the town group that a metro problem
existed in Grinnell.”
The problem comes mostly from persons under 25 who take
out their "freedom" by resulting _ physically and manually —
members oi the Grinnell Community, especially metro students,
states Kelly.
Kelly felt the need {or an AfroAmerican group for seltrpreservation has developed against the town's attitude of “company in-
action."
The group was formed last semester originally to participate
in the nation-Wide project of defining the role of the metro in the
United States. They concluded that considerable allocation resulted when the term “Black Power" was used too closely in con-
section with AimAmericanlsm.
, Defining “Black Power," Kelly says it suggests the “idea oi
self~respect oi the metro as well as emphasizing tin appreciation
of the American metro culture."
He observed that the Grinnell metro is not really a part of the
substitute, because he can, Kelly said, partially escape through
his education. Still, Kelly said, the Grinnell metro will have to do
considerable “soul searching" in defining whether or not to ignore
the problem: of ”inadequate housing. poor jobs, and interior editcntion which produce the metro who is assumed of his metro jul.
sure."
llilllillillllllllllillillllllilllllllllllllillllillillillllllllllllllllitlllllllllllliillllllllllllillllllillllllllllllilllllllllllllillllllillllliilllllillllllillllliillllllllllllltll
were used and police invited
student directories.
The death of the political,
cuba, took place when the copy
attacked the forms.
According to the current issue
of The Movement, “there are
no windows on the side of the
building from which the police
attacked; therefore, a student's
bullet would have had to make
two right angels to hit a political,"
“The accused are: Douglas
Wallace, who was already in
jail at the time of the murder;
Floyd Nichols and Charles coleman, who were on the other side
of the city; Trazewell Franklin
and John Parker, who were in
bed when the police attacked."
Movement said funds are l|r<
gently needed to support the
iivc.
BEAR TIMED
A 1939 Grinnell Pill Beta
happy has been promoted to
Vice President-International 0i
Time magazine's Time-Life international.
Formerly managing director
of Time’s publishing operations
abroad, Charles Bear will ever—
case “final authority over all
corporate intematiollal matters," according to officials oi
the magazine.
A native oi Washington, la,
Bear received his BA. in history at Grinnell. He took his
Masters Degree in International Relations at gifts College's
Fletcher School of Law and
Diplomacy.
Bear is presently serving on
President largest'a advisory
Committee on Student site. ,
 
Friday. January 25, i958
 
@ertnmmiorm
prohibited by gosgnotlssﬂ'hits SVNDICATE
INTRODUCING PAT OLIPHANT
By NEIL FISCHER
Pat Ollplnnt 10013 like the little penguin (or whatever it is)
that ornnlpresently can be found making slide comments in the
corner or an Olipilant cartoon. ,. ,
The first time I saw hint handling around the DENVER
POST‘S news room, I knew exactly who he was.
I was I copying at the time, and the capyboys worked in n
narrow room lined with mail<to-wall relatives from sunday wire
services. It hadn‘t been but a
year since elephant had won
his Pulitzer Prize, and he must
‘have been feeling pretty prev-
‘ various.
humor was company among
the state — especially the copybuys.
“He comes in here and reads
a little wire copy. Gets him
ideas,” alleged one of my compared.
“Then he goes into his office,
does his cartoon in live minutes, and states at the wall for
the rest of the day. i seen him.
He‘s weird."
Well, he inn’t weird. really.
He's just good.
And alter looking for l cartoonist on campus for over a
year and seeing none, i decided
to go professional and buy him
(or my semester on the soil.
'The L05 ANGELES TIMES Syndicate sold him (that is, his
cartoons) to us, Ind I want you all to know he’s damn expensive.
it you scanned his cartoons this week, you know he's good, so
we won't go into that anymore.
- elephant was already it cartoonist of note when he moved from
South Australia to the United States in 1964. in 1958 he won one of
“IE top two prizes in London‘s “Great Challenge Editorial Cartoon
Competition," an international contest designed to find the lunniest editorial artist in the world. All system nations were red)
reserved in the competition, and brilliant represented the ADELAlDE (Australia) ADVERTISER
The 29-year~old artist replaced Paul Conrad as cartoonist-investments at the DENVER (Colorado) POST in 1964. In 1966 he
won both the Pulitzer Prize and the Sigma Delta Chi award {or
editorial containing.
Olipham still remains his Australian accent, but his point of
view is strictly American His cartoons are candidates to over ion
newspapers across the u.sr Most journalists l’ve talked to think
he’s the host American cartoonist for editorial work next to
contain."
conrad appears in THE DES MOINES REGISTER.
The basis ct elephant‘s cartoon is, simply, humor. “In those
instances where a particularly grid subject might indicate a
straight approach," he believes, “the contrast that humor artistic
threats the message home with irish impact."
Take a look at the elephant editorial cartoons in this issue of
the Sim. And then make it a hahit to regularly enjoy this bright
new work in the oldest college newspaper West of the Mississippi.
 
 
 
 
 
PAT OLIPHANT
'liiliitKE,min‘I
ﬁi‘s’ié'htic
A
i .
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
 
 
 
- nut-atm-
Page I
"THEY WONT GET US TO THE CONFERENCE TABLE . . . will. THEY?"
 
 
lﬂb PULITZER PRIZE tar EDITORIAL CARVOONINO
Gimmwmhmmm
.oimsoei by tztosi.toioizrmo-situated-rt:~
'LOWER KEY. GEORGE. LQWER km-
Ditivfomed lay Eosgingeles‘i'lmzs SYNDICATE
 
(hugh IO
SCARLET AND BLACK
PARIETALS. HOURS ELSEWHERE
MINNEAPOLIS, Dec. 21
IACP) — Social regulations and
the philosophy behind them are
one target of the student power
movement, and some changes
can be attributes in part to the
activists, but others have wmex
solely by administrative degree
in recognition of the member of
the times.
A freshman cold at a Minnesota college was required to
move into a directory even
though her home was a block
from the campus. _
At Texas Technological university, Lubbock, 34 male students took to the courts to tight
a rule requiring them to live
on campus.
President Wilson H. plains
oi the University of Maryland
put his foot down on a recommendation to close doors of student rooms during legal limitations, saying the recommendation “put sex ringtones" on
computational activity.
Debate over open houses and
open doors is nothing new: it
has been several years now since
the Well - publicized case of the
male form resident at Yale who,
receiving against a policy requiring doors during limitation
to be open the width of a book,
constitutes matchhooks for teXt<
books.
OPEN HOUSES, DOORS
since then, debate has been
sporadic but often intense. This
fall at the University 0! california, Berkeley, Dean oi Students raleigh Williams “extends
oil from two to ten the number
of residence room visits permitted each month by members
of the opposite sex," according
to a Daily California report.
The extension was not created
as enthusiastically as might
have been expected, however.
It was coupled with calculations “that all guests be reported upstairs by their hosts,
and that the doors to rooms oi
all participating students remain
wide open at all times."
The administration View on
open doors inevitably takes into
account the possibility that the
public would view such a policy
as entertainment of licentiousness.
CURFEWS CURBED
Michigan State University and
the University of Minnesota recently eliminated curious for
all directory women except
freshmen, who are generally
thought by administrators to require a period of adjustment between the assumed regulations
of home and the complete trees
dom of a no-hours policy.
Western Michigan University,
Kalamazoo, extended form ci05<
ing to 2 a.m. for seniors and
seniors and began a senior women's hall with no hour restrictions. But despite the improvement over the old system, the
Western Herald wash’t satisfied.
The newspaper tried the uni<
variety to follow Michigan
State's example.
Hours for senior women at
Wartburg College, beverly, 1a.,
were specialized by the insulation
of a key system for senior women but some messages oi the
old system remained: wisconsin<
are promotion (with no appeal)
for lending a key to an incredible cold and a staff $25 penalty
for losing the key.
Still other schools are pushing
for change.
At the University of North
Carolina, a references last
spring showed, the Daily "rotHeel said, that “a majority of
needs here favor extension of
closing hours, elimination 0!
closing hours for seniors, libera
animation of the overnight without system [or girls who have
blanket parental permission,
and the option to live in offcampus housing for needs who
are either seniors or 21 years
old."
The Tar Heel suggested that
Depends on the giant. Actually, some giants are just regular,
,kinds of guys. Except bigger.
And that can be an advantage. m
How? Well, for one thing, you‘ve got more going for'
'you. Take Ford Motor Company. A giant in an exciting
and vital business. Thinking giant thoughts. About develop‘
ing Mustang. Cougar. A city car for the future.
n Come to work for this giant and you‘ll begin to think,
like one. .
Because you‘re dealing with bigger problems, the
consequences, ofcourse, will be greater. Your responsibilities
heather. That means your experience must b: better—more
complete. And so, you‘ll get the kind of opportunities only a,
giant can give. ’_
‘ Giants just naturally seem to attract top professionals)
Man that you'll be working with and for. And some of that,
talent is bound to run off.
Becauuﬂare’cigarette do, you‘lﬂown mobility
You'll develop a talent for making hard‘noted, imagine-i
[ch decisions. And you'll know how these decisions attack
the gets of the operation. At the grass roots. Because you'all
have been there.
if you‘d like to be a giant yourself, and your better
ideas are in ﬁdance, product engineering, manufacturing.
marketing and sales, personnel administration or systems
research. see the man from Ford when he visits your cam us.
Or send your resume to Ford Motor Company, Col go
Recruiting Department.
You and Ford can grow bigger together;
to: hits-tom most), DIAAIOIHv moms-
store armed
All EQUAL xml‘ﬂinrn’ unborn.
What’s it like
to work
for a giant?
I'd like a big job please. ‘
 
F 'day. January 25. ms
the Dean of Women look not to
the results of a alumni survey
but to other schools for guidelines in building a new system
of womens rules,
SEX OFF CAMPUS
A target at still other schools,
among them South Dakota State
University and North Texas
State University, is a policy programming students in oil-campus
apartments from having visitors
of the opposite sex.
And then there’s the question
of whether students should be
allowed to live in apartments
at all. Until recently, needs at
the University of North fares
line were not permitted to [we
in apartments. NDW, Senior women have that privilege.
PERMlSSION GRANTED
When students at Texas Tech
were denied permission to begin<
her this fall because they were
not residents in the campus
housing, the University Daily
reported that they ﬁled an inspection against the university,
training financial liability to
live in directories.
And alter Weeks of arbitration, the students suspended in
getting a appeals system established to consider such cases
and grant permission to live or:
campus in» some instances. .
“Much more is involved," the
Daily commented, “than the
right of students to live not
campus this fall, as both side!
of the suit realize.”
“The case is one of nation
wide preference and importance, affecting apartment owns
era, school administrators and
bond holders in every city in
the nation with a college or
university campus."
BIBLE MORALS AT V. U.
At the Valparaiso Congress.
during which the students were
surprised by the announcement
that curious for Senior women
would soon be published, Dean
of Students Luther Koepke explained the philosophy underlying rules at Valparaiso.
Three kinds oi rules are em
forced, xoeploe said: “moral
rules from the Bible or from
God (teaching students Christian ethics is a v.u. objective).
civil rules which must be opened
as the exists of authority, and
social rules informed to lnsm
ordered living conditions.”
New Location
Across from the
Post Oﬁice and
next to the makers
THARP'S
Pharmacy
For
Du Barry Cosmetic:
Mia Cosmetics
Mary Sherman
Helen myers
St. John's bay cum
King's Candy
 
Friday, Llanuary 16. INS
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
GRINNELL "66" — IN ”68"?
Publication of Henry Wilhelm’s "oldest established col-
legs textbook West of the Mississippi,” Grinnell College—1966,
has been delayed again.
Wilhelm, 24, a morning Grin»
well student and former editor
or the official college cycling,
explained the new delay in a
letter to subscribers mailed a
low days ago. '
"when we last wrote you the
book was at a printer who had
agreed to do the job for us,"
Wilhelm said. “Subsequent to
that, a senior officer in the firm
decided that they would mt
print the book because," he
said, of ‘the book's past his»
wryr.”
“We have been told by the
(new) printer," he added, “that
the book will be completed toward the end at February, so
we’ll pass that on to you.”
"But," he noted, “we teen
rather embarrassed to guarantee anything, so we can’t promise that date for sure.”
NEW PRINTER ANONYMOUS
Wilhelm said he had located
another printer, this one in New
York. He told the 5&3 that his
lawyer, Michael forward, oi
 
Last minute shopping for North Campus
weekend?
Your favorite beverages and
party tracks
A
normally’s Super lialu
 
REGISTER
For
PLAYTEX
GIRDLE
and
of
Your Choice
AT DOWNSTAIRS
IIINII
at POYNTERS
Grinnell’s Complete
Style Shop for Women
SOMETHING NEW EVERY DAY
Washington, D. C., advised him
not to divorce the name of the
new printer “because or possible harassment by the college."
The previous publisher of
Grinnell College—1966 had identl<
died himself as Richard Chap-
its?
HENRY WILHELM
Photo by keys Neumunn
man, Grinnell College ’21, ot
the New Concepts Publishing
Company in Washington, D. C.
College records, however, did
not indicate that sherman was
an alumni of Grinnell.
“At this point the type has
been set and problem, and the
plates are being prepared,"
Wilhelm explained in the letter.
“The very same double-impression printing process is being
used as we previously advertiser. The new printer is chart
ing somewhat more; (The cost
of the book has reached tour
times the original estimate,
Wilhelm later told the SM?)
the difference will come out Of
our pockets.”
ROUGHLY 750 SUBSCRIBERS
Asked how many copies of
the established annual had
been paid for, Wilhelm blessed
“roughly 750, I'd say."
“We've still got a long way
to go to break even," he concluded.
“The type is absolutely set.
The book is deﬁlikely progressive,” the Grinnell, la. resident
stated. “We've now reached the
point of no return."
TRIP TO N. Y.
Wilhelm went to New York
last weekend to “personally"
check on the progress of the
publication He said he’d be
back in the town of Grinnell
later this week to report on the
progress.
“We hope that you will bear
with us on this;" he said, "we
logo I!
ADMISSIONS BOOK STYMIEI]
By DIANA SALURI
Limited student response has
temporarily called work on the
proposed student-written ad.
missions booking. Publication
will not be in time for this year’s
prospective students as was
originally planned.
The Student Senate Admissions Committee, sponsors of
the project, received only fifteen contributions in response
to a school-wide collecting campaign at the end of last semester.
According to committee chairman Doug pollution, the contributions were packing in marie.
ty as well as in number.
“Many ot the topics students
chose to write on," he commented, “were quite similar.
Because we didn't get the comprehensiveness we teen is necessary to represent all aspects
oi Grinnell, we don't feel that
we should rush into putting I
book together right away.”
Plans (or a student - written
admissions guide for problem
times were ﬁrss made after members oi the committee studied
a similar publication put
out by Carleton College. The
project is backed ﬁnaturally by
the admissions office budget
and subject to the review of the
Faculty Committee on Admins
lions.
Dale Terry, director of ads
missions, thought the book would
be a valuable supplement to the
regular catalogue.”
Toilefsun sees three possible
alternatives for the future at
the booking: the committee will
again silicon contributions at
large, assign specific contributions, or account a single author
for the book.
In addition to publishing an
admissions guide, the Student
Admissions Committee has tall}
en over the job of financing
student contacts with perspectives over Christmas vacation,
They have also been gathering
application terms and admin.
signs data from other illegal
for a comparative study or admissions procedures.
pollution defines the main goal
at the committee as being “the
attraction or topnotch students
by presenting the interesting!
creative and exciting aspects
Grinnell."
Other members of the come
little are Sara cartoon, Terry
Mossholder, P e a r l dakota,
Kathy center. robert ranges.
and David Cavander.
 
doubt that you feel as printed
about this delay as we do.”
HISTORY OF BOOK
Grinnell College — 1966 was
originally going to be the official college textbook for that
year. Wilhelm and co-editor
John Phillips, 21, formerly of
Algona, 1a., mailed the javascript to its ﬁrss printer, a ﬁrm
in carnival, Mo., last April—
long after the normal publication (late.
The printers mailed it back to
Grinnell, telling the college they
would only publish it it they received a hard and last release
from any legal responsibility
from Grinnell College.
The book, the first printer
suggested, “was a major departure from what is normally
found in a a college textbook."
The book allegedly contained
pictures of a marijuana party
on campus, a male and female
student leaving n local motel
together, and computational
beer blast.
“There women’t any obscenq
pictures,” Wilhelm told the As.
situated Press last May, "N
nodes or anything like that.
John F. sherman, the attorney
for Grinnell College said h.
counted "at least 30 instance!
oi potential label" in the textbook.
Both Wilhelm and Phillips, t
book‘s editors, ﬂunder out o
Grinnell. The College refused l
publish “Grinnell College—1m,
and Wilhelm decided to Mil.
it published himself.
 
Europe This Summer
Reserve Early
Student ship May 25 surround — from slao. NSA
Group being formed for air round trip. Plenty oi ”Shoe-
string Tours" availabier
Let Us Know Your Interests
GRINNELI. TRAVEL CENTER
 
Welcome Back!
sweet's lAUNDRY
GRINNELL'S ONLY HOME-OWNED LAUNDRY
Specializing in Shirts and Washponts
Serving the North Campus Agency
236-6072
 
Page II
Greenfield sample: For Grade
LOGICAL BLACKJACK
BY DAVE HORWA‘TT
S & B staff Writer
in the final rush of last
semester when most students
were writing two papers a
night, Tom Greenfield, North
counter sophomore, was sitting in a daily lit jackson
playing blackjack.
Greenfield was fulfilling an
assignment in Logic (Phiios
ophy 121).
The professor of the course,
John harley, gave students the
opportunity to do either an
hourly, or a paper or project
dealing with some faces of logic.
Greenfield chose to give a demonstration of a winning strategy
in the game of blackjack.
Several years ago Greenfield
read about Edward 0. Thorpe, a
Professor of Mathematics at the
University of California, who
with the aid of a computer, developed a system of winning at
blackjack using the casino rules
at Las Vegas,
Thorpe published a book in
1962—13er The Dealer which
advanced several schemes for
coming out ahead in betting on
"twenty-one".
The book was so successful
that Las Vegas gambling houses
made rule changes to try to
components.
Greenfield had trouble finding
a copy of Thorpe's book, but
finally got one mailed to him
from a Chicago bookstore. He
selected the ”count-ten” system
for his demonstration.
The game of Blackjack works
like this:
The dealer deals two card:
to himself and to each of the
other players. Usually the dealer has one card showing and
the other face down, or “in the
hole." The player receives both
cards down.
Every card has a numerical
value; face cards a value of
ten; the Ace a value of one or
eleven (at the player's discretion); and other cards have
their face value.
The object of the game for
HAMMAN'S
APPAREL
sessions for You
EN D OF MONTH
Clearance
Sale
Prices classes On
COATS
CAR COATS
DRESSES
BLOUSES
SKIRTS
SLACK SETS
SWEATERS
Come in to
cayman’s Often
And Browse
For Savings of
20% to 50%
the pin or is to obtain a total
from his cards that is greater
than the dealer's, while not cite
feeding twenty—one—When he's
“posted”.
An Ace and a Card valued at
ten give the player a “natural
blackjack”. If the player is
dealt a pair then he may play
each card as a separate hand.
Betting can vary from a 25s
minimum to $150. The player
is betting on what he thinks his
advantage is against the dealer.
Thorpe simply encourage;
methods for examining the
hands of the player and dealer.
Working with possibilities gives
the player a strategy of betting
that will bring him out ahead
over a period of time—any<
where from one to ten percent
ahead.
Essentially the ten count sys<
tel has the player count the
number of lens (there are SIXtieen in a full deck,) and content from cards shown.
As the ratio of non-lens to lens
decreased, the player's chance:
increase.
Thorpe used his ten count
method in Nevada. Working
with 510,000 capital loaded by
two legislative dictionaries
Thorpe coupled the capital other
thirty hours of conservative
betting.
Tom Greenfield used I very
tion oi the ten count strategy
from .Bent The .Dealer.. He
played a total of 346 hands using a minimum bet of 35 and a
maximum of :25. Out of a hypothetical 52.340 bet. Greenfield
won $240 or better than ten percent profit.
However Greenfield only
played about 15 hands with
harley, which were not enough
to show the advantage of the
player with the Thorpe system.
in the half hour game Greenfield came out a few dollars behind on the betting.
harley commented on greene
field’s brief demonstration. “it’s
like a high-bumper who leaves
to jump six feet. When he goes
to show somebody he only
pumps five feet and tracks his
teeth on the bar.”
harley was pleased that a
student did something creative
with logic, and Tom Greenfield
got an ”A" for his trouble.
GLASSES
Made and impaired
in Our Laboratory
Contact Lenses
Causes and
Solutions
Eyes Examined
Phone 236-3971
E. J. lenses, 0.0.
OPTOMETRIST
Across from Post Office
cloud Thin-I. PM.
and flat. PM.
SCARLET AND BLACK
allow ﬂy a .V. ncrnhardt
TOM GREENFIELD (left), North counter sophomore, deals
the cards to Prof. John harley in a demonstration or gambling
with logic. The half-hour demonstration was Greenfield's final
In logic.
 
SUBPOENA ENVY
By MARTIN JEZER
LIEERATION News Service
“There’s a d l s o a s 2 going
around called ‘subpoena en<
vy.’ Everyone has it."—
Michael member
New YORK, N. Y., Jan. 15—
Morc than 500 people joined Dr.
Benjamin stock, Marcus Raskin, Mitchell boolean, William
Sloane cotton, and Michael member in the conspiracy to “comm
tel, aid and abet" draft resist
tags at a RESIST Resistancrally last night at New York's
Town Hall.
For over an hour. Peoria in
the audience filed on to the
Town Hall stage to sign the RB
SIST support petition and to
contribute money to The Resistance.
The money was donated in
developed with the donor’s
name and address and a statement of complexity printed on
them. The developed minus the
Please Note
Corrections on
Activities
Calendar
STRAND
Bookings
28-30 ~—
New Booking
"The
Family
wuyll
Starring
sales Mills
contributions, will be turned
over to the Justice Department.
Among the speakers at the
rally were member and boolean.
boolean read a statement
from Dr. stock calling for
“thousands upon thousands of
draft designers. What we have
been doing to encourage draft
resistance as the most effective
way to end the war, we intend
to go on doing."
lliiillliiHullHumlillliiiillliilllliiiilllliililliililllllllIIlHlillllliilllliilll
Free at story Brook
STONY BROOK, N.Y., Jail.
17, (LNS) — The student government at the State University
here will conduct a campus references in early February to
determine whether it should
spend $60,000 on a new “free
university” which would employ
several teachers whose con-
else the opposite
blank page as
your entry blank
January 15, [Ml
PANCAKE PROTEST
SAN FRANCISCO, Jan. 11
(LNS) — Former Stanford Student Body President Dave cal'his led 400 demonstration this
morning through his second refused of induction and a package breakfast in prove Park,
Berkeley.
Harris arrived for induction
on a bus at 6' 15 a.rn. to meet
his supporters, all in a cherry
mood, and an army of the press
About the men facing induction, he said, “These cats are
not here because they want to
be; they’re here because they're
afraid. This whole society has
made Ulem afraid for the last
19 years.” He added, “Let them
do what they want with my
body. They can't take my
mind."
mapping up his induction papers, Harris said, “Those people
I was supposed to kill and those
people going into the army and
all oi you are my brothers . . .
i call on every person registered
with the SS system to refuse to
corporate with that system;
those who have not registered
to refuse to register; those in
the Army to refuse to corporate."
At the package gig, center
battlefield and Dr. Genevieve
shopper read statement of support anything Lloyd Dennis, who
will refuse induction in Cleveland tomorrow. ,
hillillliiiillliMilliiilllliiilliiiilliiiilllliHilliiiilliHillllHillllillllliililil
tracks have been cancelled by
the university.
The four teachers to be hired
for the free school. however,
would be selected by I student
panel which would be free to
employ some new faculty as
well u some of the four d19missed ones.
The proposed 860,000 apartment comes from a student
activity tee of $50 per student,
i635?“
2E3“?
 
anal Clearance
$3
FRI.
SAT.
MON.
for
3 DAYS
Values $5.99 to $14.99
BROWN'
snow FIT co.
 
 
 
'ago l4
GERMAN RADICAL
UNIVERSITIES
BERLIN (CPS)—The paradox
of being a “radical Student" is
that you have to belong to a
university, which almost auto.
basically makes you un-radical.
’At the same time, the united‘u
city is considered the ideal
place to “basically " others.
This paradox has been especially nursing in Germany,
whose public is still going
through a thank-God-we’re-notextremist—any-more stage. Most
people are scared to death of
radicalism on the right or left,
Including most of the faculty
In even the most “progressive"
universities.
Until recently, the students
thought the Free University of
Berlin would be a good compaq
miss. The teachers were young
and internationally requested,
the students were thread, and
there was plenty of money.
But it wash't good enough.
Just over two months ago
2,000 Free University students
met in the Auditorium Main
imum on its Dahlcm campus
to begin a “Critical University"
Io fill what they called the “pm
optical vacuum” In German student life and to get out of the
“radical student" paradox.
The Critical University (CU)
Is a “concrete utopia to give
continuing and relevant political
Instruction," according to the
University of Hamburg student
newspaper, Auditorium. The
magazine Der Spiegel describes
it as “a mixture of Marx, sao
and Marouse.”
SCARLET AND BLACK
members Marcuse is the German-born christopher who says
that a society devoted to liberalism—free and returned do
hate, “equal time” for opposite
sides—can never undergo radical change and has no place
for radical solutions. In this
way, he argued, the “liberal"
society is more surrounding than
the “conservative” one.
The (CU) is really a political
l oriented Free University.
accessory are invited into
classes as participants rather
than centuries. The students
control the curriculum and content. Courses have names like
“History of Revolution" and
“Advertising and Educational
Reform."
There are no degrees, and the
students contribute what they
can to keep it going.
The Critical University of
Berlin didn't so much grow out
of a desire for student power
as a desire to make radicals
—the paradox once again, it
wash't that the established Gen
man universities had too much
powerful one interested in politics took them too seriously—
but that radicals can't grow in a
studied of liberalism.
The issues contracting the
German radicals are much the
same as those In american the
everything concern is the rise
of the military-industrial complex. To investigate the burgeonlng power in the minerals
in Germany, the CU in Hamburg recently invited “Der
Spiegel” military editor CarlGideon Von plant‘ to a “class“
and mercilessly pubmed him
for Information on (he’stniotum of Germany‘s Armed
Forces and their covers and
every relations with German
businessmen.
The CU seems to be more an
searching organization than any
kind of hard-line societies or
communist one, Certainly there
are columnists in it, and
everyone says he's a socialistl
Friday. January 16. I“
but there is more a commitment to "general revolution"
than to something like the specific overthrow of Germany‘s
government.
American radicals differ from
their European counterparts in
this reflects they are much
more entered with the elimination—one way or another—
of the Johnson government.
(of course, you could say that
they are brothers-under-thin
suds in a way, since the Euros
plan radicals would like to get
rid of the Johnson government
too.)
The Idea of the Critical or
Counter-University has been
adopted in some form in Berlin,
Muenster, Frankfurt, Hamburg,
Main: and Heidelberg in her.
many, as well as in Amsterdam
and London, The idea is expects
ed to blowjob in other Euro<
plan cities, and Is therefore
certain to guarantee broadbased “student power" all over
the continent,
—-——————————
' ' ° ' INTERNATIONAL DISPATGH ’ ' ' ' ' NEWSFEATURES ’ ' ' ' ' INTERNATIONAL DISPATGH‘ ' ' '
-———————___
i By MARK COMMER
LIBERATION News service
Talk to a young French leftIst today and he'll tell you that
France is the only country with
a truly "mature left.“
Talk to a journalist, some
what older and more identical,
and he’ll tell you sally, "La
France, helps, c'est la Sulsse”
— that is, it has no politics at
all.
And to a young American
baptist, who is in no position to
coast of his country’s radical
tradition, what the French
choose to call mature politics
often seems to be more highway
pulled “single."
The left finds Itself in a peculiarly equivalent position
under do Gaulle. They may
disease the imperial personality of “le grand Charles,"
but they field that his nineteenth . century nations of
French empire sometimes
make for good politics, at least
abroad. He Is, after all, they
tell you, the only Western leader to give the United States a
little of what it reserves, His
every opposition to the Vietnam
war, for example, and his
conservation of israel in the
line sunday war winclde very
well with the views of many on
the French lefti As a result,
do Gaulle's encountered foreign
policy creates an Internal political atmosphere conducted to
baptist anti-war activity.
De GAULLE DOMINATES
At the same time, however,
'de Gaulle’s overwhelming refinance in French politics has
made opposition and resistance
into a game and a pose more
than an effective political life.
Be Gaulle's domestic policies
leave to enhance the status of
private capitalism, and do less
than nothing to Change the right and hierarchical structure
ol French society.
recent changes in the French
educational system, for exam<
pre, make it even more difficult than before for lower and
oven middle-income students to
FRANCE A M GAUCIIE
gain scholarships to the universities. in a country with
limited resources, an aggressive policy abroad is gotten at
the price of impressive politics
at home,
The pregnancy and influence
of the left is due in part to the
engineering presence of the
French Communist Party
(PCF), a bureaucracy of nine
million members whose aspira<
tions are only a little more
revolutionary than those of
london Johnson's Democratic
Party. As the largest function.
ing political party In France,
the PCF nominated activity on
the left; and because of Its
conservation, It seldom pre‘
seats a significant challenge to
the fundamental political and
social structure of the country.
Its problems are compressed
by its right theoretical france
and its schizophrenic political
personality. 0 win g penalties
culturally to France, but continually to the soviet Union, the
PCF defines itself by taking pi»
options consistently contrary to
those of the Gaullist government. dependent of the Communist Party point out, however, that if the PCF were any
more revolutionary, it would
lose three-quarters of its mem<
worship.
There is also a Federation of
the Left (Federation de la
Gauche), an amalgam of
smaller baptist parties and {actions including several varieties oi mechanism.
But the Federation is unfortunately so deeply men by internal disputes that its public
face is heritage and sensitive
at best.
i was present In wanted our<
ing a one-day, nation-wide gen<
oral strike against the modern.
ment in mid-December. Called
by the consideration level'alex
ties Travailleurs and other mas
jar labor unions (principally
Communist), the strike was
given advance publicity in all
French newspapers with the
matter-ef—partners of a notice of
work stopping due to clinical
didﬁculture.
in wanted, the strike began
with a demonstration in a public
square at ten o’clock in the
morning. Representatives of
each union partner before the
microphone, demanding higher
salaries and a larger share at
the national wealth, while a few
hundred workers stood by talking idle among themselves, and
a few hundred university students pulled themselves with
their revolutionary banners. At
10:30 the microphone went dead
(apparently the strike had
reached the electric workers as
well).
As we began to march, std<
cents pointed their banners and
began a chorus of the Commur
list Internationale; the workers
granted their bicycles and
models and allowed alongside.
There were no bystanders to be
seen; most merchants had taken a one~day holiday, an extended weekend. In Neighborhood
banks, sellers jokes to one another that they would run out
of candles if the electrical work
era kept striking so often.
“WORKERS AND
STUDENTS UNITE"
Events did not go according
to plan. As we approaches the
Prefecture, where our demands
were to be presented to the appropriate authorities, tigers ensure a hundred conference at
the front of the matching col.
umn among the union leaders.
The march processed past the
Prefecture, showed for an constant constantly, then moved on
and turned up a narrow side
street. The students were diseases, operated; they shorter
after the laborers, “Workers
with students, pulled together!"
The workers‘ continuing disappeared around a corner, Be<
rendered and indignant, the students returned to the Prelim"
sure, changed elegant for see-
oral minutes in front of two
variety caused gendarntes
(“More scholarshipsl") and
distances. As we made our
way back to the stack bar to
eat a late breakfast, one student intended that his banner
was beginning to lose its color,
after so many daily - day
matches.
Such are the salaries of a
Left so profoundly institutionalized that it has lost its sense
of urgency, a Left so rapidly
theoretical and traditional that
it has lost all touch with changing political and social conditions, The notion of “compatibility" in classical Marxism has
led many students to believe
that the great secretariat NW
caution will come of its own am
cord; that It is consequently
sufficient simply to “go
through the options" of pro
testing.
it is also very sustainable to
be a baptist, even if one's connections are more historical
that real. “Being left in
French universities is a way or
qualifying to your intelligence,"
explains one student with
gentle sarcasm.
LES CHINOIS
AND TKOTSKYISTS
There are, fortunately, parties other than the watts Conlmuniste branches in the French
Left. “Les cliiiiois,” the tablets, have become very women
bus in recent years, and often
engage in pitch bottles with
Commiinist- Party members at
public concentrations. There
occasional eccentrics are satin-izcd in a recent film by Jean‘
Luc forward, “La Cliiiioise,"
and he has since been billy
granted a “reactionary.”
The rotskyists are also eX<
performing a great removal of
late, and their literature can be
distinguished from that of the
PCP by both its military historic and its urgent calls for
I Fourth international. Tha list
could go on to include all other
reasonable doctrinal schools,
most of which appear minor,
even unreal, to the considers
Ultimately, such sections seem
to cancel one another out he<
cause so much of their energy
is taken in depending theology.
cal differences over coffee in
a Paris cafe.
Those French dentists with
whom I spoke were surprising
ly charitable towards the American left, though corresponding.
We are very emergency, they say,
but still very creature: we lack'
both numbers and institutional
structures (parties). Without the
discipline organization of a map
ty, they argue, we can never
hope to contract and replace
institutionalized power as it exists. automatically, we are “unsophisticated;” we have still
not granted the essential notion
that the revolution will come
from the workers, and from nowhere else. it is for that red.
son that they give far greater
presence to the black movement
In the United States than to the
white, White middle~class std<
cents have too great it stake in
the power structure to become
truly revolutionary. What we
have reflected is the latest dis<
content of the farmer and factory labeled. While that may be
so, it seems unlikely that an
American revolution will develop along classic largest
lines, given the political history
of the American labor move<
merit.
The situation is not all so
break as it first appears to be.
For allow its indicating, the
French left is Still more alive
and active than that of England
(who'd), in addition, the French
are not presently living in a
political atmosphere poielttially
so revolutionary as ours in the
United States. Authority dresses
down upon the French citizen
as well, but it IS a more canal
expression, [as visible, and for
the moment less marsh.
 
Friday. January 16. l‘ibﬂ
O A p_o———s ion ii in
Elli—MTANG
ii— the player to move
must make a move that
will bring on his defeat.
By J. RAZ
Zugzwang is intended to increase the public opposite for the
game of Chess and to provide wholesale meals in disable thanks
as well as affiliation tickets of knowledge. In coordination with the
newly formed Chess Club, Zugzwang win other a menu of delicious
Chess activities and range events.
Are you a Chess gourmet and do you have any private
recipes? Mail your games to Box 886.
Suffering from integration? if there is a demand, an occasional article may be devoted to Avalon Hill Games, Backgammon,
Risk, Diplomacy, Monopoly, speakers etc.
Requests for articles should include name, box number, and
telephone number. Articles may also be submitted for complete
inclusion in Zugzwang. For example, ii you feel you know a winning strategy for the germany in “The Battle of the judge" feel
free to submit your battle plans.
Are you lonely? Have you acquired topless skills which because of the lack of an opponent are becoming busty and even
more topless? Zugzwang can serve you as a public knock for such
announcements.
(Zugzwang, by the way, is a Chess term which is used to describe the opportunity position which a player is in when any and
every move he makes leads to an immediate reasoning of his
position — of loss of material.)
The Chess Club will meet regularly at 8 RM. Thursdays at the
coffee house in the Forum. The Club is organizing a team which
will Compete with other clubs in the area. Courses will be available for beginners, and the Club will stock any available Chess
publications.
IiliiiilliiiillliiiliiiiiilliiiiIIIiiiilliiiillliiiiliiiilliiiiiiliiiiiliiiiiiliiiiilliiillliiiilliiiiiilliiilliiiiilliiiilliiiiiiiiiiilliiiiilliiiiiiiiiilliiiiliiiiiiliiiiilliiiiilli
PERSONALS
(Editor‘s note: Personal advertisements should he placed
in the 5&3 mailing or sent to
holly Wolf or John Pepper at
least one week prior to the desired publication date. Ad rate
is three cents per word, including articles and prepositiuns.
Cash should be included with
your ad copy.)
COUNSELLORS FOR sMALL
(bus camp Camp carlo-i'hence as
annual. grocery, and and crafts,
mailing. nature study. cumpcrnrt,
tennis, WSl, or English writing.
Northern Wisconsin. Mr. rrisbie
will be on campus Monday, January
as, who am to 12:30 pm sign up
in Placement civic ARI-l annex.
ANCONA come: HOME; we round
your least. —the STAFF
RED wALLia—r lost January )0,
With at least $20 cash. Please re»
turn. Reward. early wiedmnn, extension 354.
MR, CROSSE'IT'S BOX ii the
Monday Nights
TWO FREE PEPSIS
with Each Large Finn
Alr conditional
SERVING 'H KINDS OF
PIZZA
HOUIS
Mon. thru Son —4:30 pan. not own.
sun. — 4:30 pan. to Midnight
FREE DELIVERV
TO ROOMS
PAGLIAI'S
PIZZA
WEDNESDAY ONLY
Salad
PHONE 136-533]
927 Broad -- Grinnell
place to put the letters "H” to."
“,"N D ' “n." or r'“ from the
supermarket b'into game. Green
steps too.
To THE UNKNOWN lucky person
who has my copy of Fellowship of
the Ring: you have had one semester to read it and it has a certain
continental value, If you really want
a copy i'Ii get you one, but please
return mine. —the acid.
PHYSIOLOGICAL psychology students. one brand new copy or Morgan's third addition text in. sale at
:4. Used to cost :9 nt bookstore.
Not usEd for class, but good supply
century reading. Neil kitchen, ex.
tension 640 or his.
crilCKst WANTED. Apply Prof.
stretch.
CHICKENS FOR SALE. apply .low
Kruusrnan.
HUNDRED POUND no
home with good family.
.john sitemap, Langan l-call.
EXPERIENCE lN LAvoui-i .vaur.
nalisiiealiy morning, that Is. You
are welcome to join the sonic of the
sea as a layout or telephone editor.
Apply sue 1: Miller, extension on.
STEREO row SALE. General Elec.
tile. Three years old, slow original
price. Asking sail. Call Ron Wood,
«.5972,
seek:
Contact
SOCK IT To u . Advertise in the
sin. subtle obscenity okay. Legitimate ids even better. We“, rnnybe.
ALL NEW 1968
I‘ll/III Illllllli I'IIIIIII
1h. DEEUTAIITE . radio x315
\lM/AM tiny udib his in in: in. quality
1min iiiuirer win u in
modrriirpriu Eindhzn PM)?
amplifier. Autum ice ytonlinl
rnrisionvi ii iihir.
that con :blogs.
At
' LEEPER'S
Open Monday
9 a.m. - 9 p.in.
SCARLET AND BLACK
@ RADIO
(continued from Page 7)
editor Barry Ancona will have
a Friday and Saturday allrnighta
er of “folkrrock and kitty com—
meets.”
Recordings of corporation
speeches, xerox quarter con—
cents and coffee house performances, will be broadcast, as well
as Theatre Department plays,
News Department reports ~—
those on drugs, student power,
and Vietnam are in the offering
—and some BBC transcriptions.
To help the disc jackets
broadcast these shows, says
Cloud, student control operators
will be helping template and op—
state the equipment.
The question OI Student access
to FM radios was brought up
two years ago when the idea of
the present campus radio was
designated. Students were
pulled on their access to FM
radios,
Roughly 25 per cent of the
student body did not own, or
have access to someone who
owned an FM radio.
Cloud says that the radio
heads are planning to supply at
cost AMAFMVAFC radios to std<
cents. The cheapest purchase
price for such a radio is estimated at his.
initiated by station manager
Armajani two years ago, the
present radio has suffered many
setbacks. Starting with its supposed formationhy SGA in
1566, many big efforts such as
corporation have taken preference with the administration.
Even after soA agreed to france the idea, the administration did not seem to approve,
Armajani indicated before an
open Senate meeting in november.
It was not until the end at
corporation in November, notes
Cloud, that the administration
could device “full efforts” to
the formation of the anonymous
campus radio station.
At the Open SGA meeting that
Armajani spoke at, he had explained the board’s en cause
reservations pro—dated January
3. If the radio were operating
by then, he had explained, the
reservations would be with.
drawn. Otherwise Armajani
said he’d reorganize the staff
when the radio would begin op
edition.
The Executive Board, all except Program Director Craig
plain, IS still impact, plain re—
signed at finals time last semester. The present staff of
over 130, according to Cloud, Is
“pretty much as it was last
spring."
Over The Border
KAMP IN GANADA
By JEAN VANDERVODRT
0f the 5&3’5 Chicago Bureau
CHICAGO — Canadian radio
guests customers partly.
“There are more people coming into Canada than leaving it.
We welcome these young people
as Canada‘s new life blood,"
broadcasts declare.
Dick camp, Grinnell sopho<
more from West morris Hall,
spent several days during Christmas in Toronto, Canada, with
a group of draft-workers. temp
dispatched Canada’s optimistic
welcome to their “new life
blood."
Canadian resistance centers
report that a minimum of 2,000
American draft-workers to a
possible 7,00" are in Canada
now. The draft age Americans
who leave to escape the 05.
perhaps as much as the army
find easy sanctuary, sponsors,
and centers to help locate long»
ing and employment there.
The designers camp met could
Live with their situation no better In Canada than in the U.
he opened in an interview when
he returned to his home in Chicago after the trip.
An overcrowded, run-down
house was camp’s residence
while in Toronto. A register
from New York center it and
eight others usually stayed
there; three or four who helped
pay rent and three or four who
created.
"Only one had a job," camp
said. "He worked in a factory."
“They can get jobs pretty
easily, but they don’t have much
addition at all.”
saint along with two Detroit
acquaintances traveler from
there to Toronto. One of the Detroit men had spent 17 months
in the army.
He was on leave now because
he had closed his bargains
rates out at gunpoint and swallowed an overcome of sleeping
pills when he learned he was
being sent to Vietnam.
The mortality, the extreme
apache characterized the confusion and fruslratiolt of the designers for camp. The ones who
were running from the draft,
from the us. government and
who didn’t really think beyond
that were the ones who didn't
do well, he said.
“The ones who have done
well are artists, people who
planned to go to school before
they went, or people skilled in
a trade."
The majority of the designers
have not yet broken away from
the United States, camp thought.
“An American kid in Canada
is not concerned about Canada,
He knows about 50 per cent as
much about Canada as about
the U.S."
“Their friends are in the 11.5.
One had a girl friend in New
York; one had a girl friend in
Detroit, I think, They didn’t
know anyone there. "
Trips back over are the big
thing. "One reserved from the
army — he was a speed-head4
started that he had gone over
the border 7 times (at Windsor
—it’s not hard them)."
“He would leave when the
FBI got on to him. They came
in the front door and he left by
the back.”
While some resistant just
exist, others become gang-ho
Canada, Dick observed. They
idealize Canada at the expense
of the United plates.
"They are becoming Canadian materials. They don’t rear
like some things. America almost necessarily has a totals.
taiwan son of government while
Canada Is small and the government dress’t have to be so complete ~ there’s sort of a pro
specialist about it.”
“They don’t recognize that
Canadian industry is an exist
sign of the United States.
Canada is just one more pain
in the countervailing power
structures and it acts as a
pain."
It inn’t a new idyllic life they
are starting, camp decided.
They carry over their old lite
so much it readers the new.
“Some of them were Southern,"
camp said, “A metro guy wanted to stay at the house, but
when they found out that ha
didn‘t have any money, they
were very corresponding. That’s
what got me; they were still
being Americans."
Would he go?
“At least i can think seriously about it now, i worlds‘t go
as an American national."
One who went was John
Phillips, former Grinneil College student. A story about
Phillips and a picture of him
taken by Henry Wilhelm, another former Grinnell student, are
printed In this week’s Saturday Evening Post.
Illllllillllllllltlllllmllllliﬂlmﬂlullllﬂmmlltlllllllllillllll
The ﬁsmile january of the
Forth River in eastern Scotland
Is called the birth of Forth.
 
Students:
It sure has been Ionesorne around here — we missed you
and hope to see you again real soon
TOMS LONGiioaN
FINE FOOD — COCKTAILS — BEER ON TAP
 
Page l6
{WWEWWWMWWWA
émwmmwomoeumaemzommm Jgé
WE EEEr EE
Emwmmmeymmmmsfmm .i"
llllllIIIllllIIIlllllIIIlllllllllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllilllllllIIIlllllllllllllillllllllllllllllilllllllllllllllllllllIIlllllllllllllllllllllilllllllll
(EZRNE ﬂlAElEliEiK
By WILLIAM ALAN GRAY
Well, wells We ﬁrally made it back from Christmas vacation
and the awful freedom which goes with a month of separation
from our natural environment has been supplanted by pages notification of coming events. Now that we are free to resume our
activities. I. M. sports once again lead to the ioreiront of campus
thought.
The last sport to be connected was badminton which was held
just before Christmas. great Dubach supplanted Phil Woodward
as the singles champion While a team from Smith took the douglas
trophy. liable took first hanging to become the first hall this year
to capture two team graphics.
Basketball now moves to the center stage and the season
promises to be one of the most bitterly connected in recent history
(but, at the same time, in the spirit of goodwill and gamesmanIhi ).
FA! the end of the final roll—oil, Dave North‘s team had taken
web first place in the college bowling league. Top efforts {or the
semester included Larry seller-man‘s 243 game and Rich pick<
Itrom’s 600 series and 177 average. The second half of the season
has started with new teams having been formed. Hopes are high
for the formation of a college bowling team which would be his
solved in some intercollegiate matches.
The Grinnell Hockey Club reports today for worthy’held to take
part in a 4 game tournament.
yard lifestyle relay. All other
events had two men per school
BEST IN
BREAST STROKE
Wayne State won ten ot the
eleven events held to win the
Grinnell delays for the second
straight year. Wayne State had
in points and was followed by
Luther (44 points), Grinnell
(20), and Northern iowa (6).
In this relay competition.
{woman teams entered in the
duo yard wesley and the 400
entered.
The Pioneers' best showing
was in the diving and 400 yard
breast stroke. Cliff Frohlich and
Don links took second in the
two man diving competition
while John sielrert and Gregg
cancer captured second in the
breast stroke.
liilllllllllllilillllllillllllllllllllillllllilllllllllllllilllllllllllllillllllilllillll
WILL THE STRAND THEATRE
please bring “The Graduate"?
 
GOLFERS JUDGED.
0N CLOSED CIRCUIT
By ADRIENNE LEMMONS
Grinneil's holders are on television. Closed—circuit, that is.
Coach add powers, using undertake experimentally as a
teaching device, found it effective in showing students what's
wrong (or right) with their seeing techniques.
“In football coaching, television tapes are more ecological
than the movies currently in use,” powers said. When movies
outline their usefulness, he added, nothing can be done with the
old film. TV tapes, on the other hand, can be framed and caused,
he said.
The TV equipment, which includes a camera and a monitor
set, was left to powers by Ray Slanderwick. a 1952 olympus
who played football and basketball under coach John A. deutsch.
Standerwick, now living in Grinnell, sells classroom turkish—
Lngs, including television sets designed for educational use.
powers was not fully satinﬁed with the equipment models be
used Though he obtained “excellent” results using it with his
golf class, he found that football pictures were somewhat nuclear.
“Besides," he said, he was unable “to really the tapes in slow
motion, and this proved to be a major playback."
powers is keeping his eyes open for improvements which will
provide cleaner photographs and enable him to use slow motion.
Such a machine, he said, would cost about $2500, while the one
he now uses sells for around $1500.
it might be a good idea, he suggested, for the college to boy
its own closed-Circuit. Available on a school-wide basis, it could
be useful in several other departments in addition to athletics,
powers said
”There will always be the problem, of course, of athletes
who would rather be TV compliant,” stated the Grinnell coach.
"Instead at concentration on their things or their passes, some
will prefer to crown for the benefit of however might be watchIng.”
But undertake, at least, can always be tragedy he concluded.
SCARLET AND BLACK
CAGER
WRAP-UP
By JEFF SCHECKTER
The Grinnell basketball team
has only won one of its last
eight ball games, but things are
looking up for the Pioneer team.
The charles and Black lost
its first two “second semester"
games at the University of Chicago's Holiday Tournament. in
the first game, Grinnell lost to
Colorado College, 81-76.
Fifty-five percent shooting
gave the Pioneers a 45-39 maritime lead but they only shot
29 percent in the second half.
Terry followed had 17 or his
21 points in the first half, Thor
johnson had 10 of 16 and Mike
Schwartz had 10 of 11L Colorado
had'your players in double figures with 22, 13, 12 and 18.
The second game saw the
ministers Ill Knox beat the
Pioneers 9565. The Knox team
had a 45-30 lead at the railway
point and then cumshot printer
50-35.
only Thor johnson (21 points)
and Mike Schwartz (19) shot lit
the double figures, while tour
Knox players scored 10. ll, 13
and 28. The ministers had only
a 3M7 edge in field goals but
made 35 of 49 foul shots as the
Pioneers committed 32 souls.
johnson looked out, and followed, >Schwartz, Rankin, christianity, Abel, and seller had
four each.
Knox beat the charles and
Black again on January 5, 86-61
shooting over 50 percent in both
valves and plymouth set the
Pioneers back 9W on January
6, out-responding them 5337.
The Grinnell team’s ﬁnest
hour so far occurred on January
12 when it pulled what can only
be called a surprise upset over
Carleton, 65-64. A 35 foot jump
shot by Mike Schwartz in the
last few seconds won the game
after the Pioneers had trailer
by as much as 15 points in the
second half.
Down by 15 early in the sets
0nd half, the charles and Black
bottles back to 48—46 on a basket
by Roger Able with nine minutes to play. Two more baskets
by Roger and one by Terry i-followed deadlocked the score at
52~52 with 8:45 to got
Carleton went to 57-54 with
six minutes to play but Grinnell
reserved things 60-57 on two
field goals by Schwartz and one
by Able. Alter 60-50 and 62—52
What’s it like
to work
for a giant?
Depends on the giant. if the
giant happens to be Ford Motor
Company, it can be a distinct
advantage See your placement
director and make an appointment to see the man from Ford
when he is here on:
@
I'd be i in: ,sb plate ‘
Friday, January 26. (960
Photo by Dick Tleumann
ROGER ABLE, number 52, moves in to sink a two~pointer
early in the GrinneuComeu game. Although the score was
tied at half time, 4545, Grinnell lost in the last minutes of the
game as the Somali team pubmed in 11 consecutive baskets.
The final score was 37-73.
ties, Mike Schwartz bank a foul
shot for a 6362 lead but Carleton went back out trout 6463.
Then with beautifully no time
left, Schwartz bank the winning
shot.
Grinnell almost made it two
in a row alter training St. Olaf
4530 at half—time but narrowly
lost 71439. The Oles shot 54 percent to the Pioneers' 31 per<
cent in the first hall.
The second half was completely different, however, and the
charles and Black had pulled
to a 68-87 score with one minute
left. A highway questionable St.
Olaf score made it 70 and then
71 to 67. A Schwartz shot made
it 7169 and Grinnell missed two
chances to tie as time ran out,
The charles and Black iu'st
again, this time on January 1G
to joe. Another close game, the
Pioneers cut a 13 point deficit
with 5:30 to play down to just
one point at the buffer. The
team shot 47 percent for the
game, but made 55 percent or
their shots in the closing minutes. They also had the edge in
rebounds 31-30r The outstanding
aspect of the Pioneers' performance was their phenomenon
accuracy from the soul line
making 93 percent of their shots
(25 0t 27).
In the latest game. Cornell
scored 11 straight points in the
last few minutes of the game to
sink the Pioneers, 87—73. print
neil, playing without captain
Mike Schwartz, remained in
convention until only 5:30 remained in the game. At this
point the score was 11—69, Cornell, but the difference rapidly
increased.
The score was tied at dealtime 45-45 and was tied nine
times in the second half. The
charles and Black led 51-30 in
responding but trailer 49%4097,
in their field goal consistency.
High showers for Grinnell were
Terry followed (26), Roger:
Able (15) and Thor johnson
(14).
Total scores for the Grinnell
players for the eight games
reported:
Thor johnson .
Roger Able
Gordon Able
Terry followed
Mike Schwartz .
Don Peterson
Greg Rankin .
Whitey Christiansuri .
Tom Lower ..
Carl seller .
Sam carroll .
 
Glad to see 'ya again
Larry’s career Shop
We specialist in All Styles
LARRY ~ GARY
932 Main
Across from Bob Reimer Clothing
. fallen material In the charles a nluelr cannon be reproduced for .
Publication purpose. without the more” consent or the editor
 
